CHAPTER I.
In contemplating the interesting scenes
and events of the American Revolution, we
are accustomed to view them as only
affecting
ourselves as Americans, and as occurring
only within the boundaries of our own land;
so that a story of the `Revolution' to be laid
in England or France would at first view
startle
and appear an incongruity of history. Yet
the one being our foe and the other our ally,
closely involve their interests as individuals
with ours and throw as profound a degree of
sympathy over the progress and issue of
events on the common theatre of war, as if
their own fields had been the scenes of
contest
.
The war of the Revolution produced
in the vales and homes of England and the
vine-clad hills of France, many a scene of
domestic trial and woe as touching as
was daily witnessed among the rude
forest
homes of our own land. Brave
warriors
parted from wives and sweethearts in
sunny France to join the issue with us for
liberty
;
many a gallant soldier bade last adieus
to a weeping maiden. ere, obedient to his
king, he buckled on his sword to sail the seas
to do battle against the rebels of the crown;
and many a hardy patriot of our fathers
shouldered
his rifle, amid prayers and tears, to
take the field to oppose the invader. Yet,
beneath
their armed breasts they wore human
hearts allthe foe, the ally, and the rebel!
The tears of the one fell as sweetly in the
eye of Pity as the other! The roar of every
battle-field shook France and England as
well as our own land, penetrating the
remotest
hamlet, and making many an expecting
heart shrink. the pulses of the three great
nations were for the time bound together and
throbbed as one. The interest of each was
equally deep, where wives, mothers, and
maidens were the judges of that interest.
The war was onethe issue one to theme!
And many is the tale still heard beneath the
vintnor's porch in
la belle
France, whose theme
is the war of our Revolution, and many is the
sad memory of that contest yet preserved on
the gossip bench of many a village ale-house
in merry England. How many were the
lives at that day, began in Europe that
terminated
in America. If every man's life,
fairly written, be a romance out-doing fiction,
how many thousands of truthful stories in
that war opened in England or France to
close their scenes hereperhaps in blood.
We shall, therefore, make no further
apology
for opening our story, which professes to
be a Romance of American waters on the
shores of France. In doing it, we but
follow
in the steps of the circumstances of the
time and of events which will bring us by and
by to the more immediate scene of the Tale.
Our story opens in the month of June, 1777,
on the north coast of France, in the
neighborhood
of Calais. It was one of those
sultry
days, so common in the tropics and which
sometimes vary the monotonous heat of
climates
further north, that a young man was
engaged with a hand-telescope in idly
surveying
from a balcony the expanse of water
which lay between the smooth beach at his
feet, and the white cliffs of England that
appeared
on the northern horizon like a snowy
cloud sinking to its rest. The place on
which he stood was a sort of ledge or
platform
,
projecting from a window in a tower
far over the precipice. It communicated
with a large apartment within the tower,
which itself formed the salient angle of an
antiquated and highly picturesque chateau of
the age of the Twelfth Louis. Though
bearing the marks of time and of many a
siege, it was not ruinous; but still wore the
imposing and martial air of its old feudal
state. Modern refinement had also added to
its elegancies and comforts which the iron
age of its founder knew little of.
After sweeping his glass once more
indolently
over the channel which was
beautifully
mottled with sunshine and shadow from
dark detached clouds that sailed slowly over
it, the young man turned it a moment
landward
upon the city of Calais, which with its
grey walls, towers and stately citadel lay a
league distant to his right, and then
listlessly
,
yet with a slight impatient gesture, threw
it aside.
`So,' he said pacing the balcony to and fro,
`this is a wearisome pastime enough; my
eyes ache with watching the dull movements
of fishing shallops and the rapid flight of
snowy sea-gulls. The white chalk cliffs of
Britain tire me with their sameness, and even
Calais with its busy quay ceases to afford
my wearied vision interest. I will take my
horse and ride along the sands a few miles;
perhaps from yonder headland I may get a
sight of the van of the squadron before the
sun sets. To-day is the third day since it
was to have weighed at Havre, and for two
nights the troops had been bivouacked on
the beach waiting its arrival to take them on
board. I am heartily tired of the land and
pant once more to tread the deck of my ship.'
`Gallantly spoken this, for a youth who is
the guest of a lady whose charms would have
broken many a brave lance in the good old
days of chivalry, and to whose youth and
beauty even modern gallants do not fail to
do homage.'
The young sailor slightly colored as he
acknowledged the presence upon the balcony
of his father and cousin.
`Nay,' he said gaily approaching them,
`I trust my fair cousin Josephine will not
attribute
my anxiety to depart to any
indifference
to her grace and beauty, but rather to
the zeal and ambition natural to a young
man, who is for the first time about to enter
upon the warlike duties of his profession.
Were I like my honored father here, an old
warrior, I should be then too proud and
happy
to cast my leaves of laurel into your lap,
cousin, and reclining at your feet, let you
wreathe from them coronals, and bind them
on my brow. But I must first go and win
them.'
`Fitly spoken, cousin,' said the maiden
laughing; shall I give you a half-century's
leave of absence, ere you return to honor me
with the duty you have imposed upon me.'
The last words were spoken in a lower tone,
and conveyed a deeper meaning than they
seemed to do.
The young man started, fixed a
penetrating
glance upon her downcast face, and
then answered, coldly. `Perhaps a half
century
were a suitable period, lady; nor in less
time can I hope to win the laurels of a hero,
nor in less time do I think you will make the
wreathe I idly spoke of.'
The brow of the lady glowed, and her
eye at first flashed, and then fell heavily
upon
the cheek, with the weight of tears that
filled them to the brim, yet were not shed.
He bit his lip, as he saw the effect he had
produced, yet did not attempt to alleviate it,
and turning on his heel began coolly to
survey
the channel. The old Marquis Fernay
was not so indifferent to what usually passed
around him, as not to discover by their
manner
,
that some misunderstanding, the grounds
of which he was ignorant of, existed between
his son and niece. He looked from one to
the other, and shook his head with indecision
and embarrassment. On one side Josephine
was standing with her large eyes shaded by
their tear-weighed lids, her head dropped,
and her cheek half turned, and her whole
attitude
expressing graceful grief. On the
other stood his son Louis, fingering nervously
with the gold tassel of his sword knot, and
with his back towards his cousin seemingly
absorbed in the contemplation of the
opposite
cliffs of England.
`Humph! humph!' muttered the Marquis;
`here is more mischief again brewing. There
is no planningno appoplectic admiral now.
I wanted to make them good friends, and to
get them to marry, and keep the family
estates
together, they are determined to hate
each other. But yet she loves
him
i'll be
sworn. I can see that with half an eye. It is
all of this scape grace Louis! I brought her
from the convent where I put her when her
parents died, on purpose to see Louis when
he came home on this visit, and that he might
see her. Yet Jacques and Lisette, my valet
and laundress both say that Captain Louis
don't care a fig for her, though she thinks a
great deal of him. Confound the boy. If now
I had kept her locked up in the convent, and
he had happened to have heard I had a niece
then rich and beautiful, devil a convent wall
in all France would have kept him outside or
her in. They would have flown away at
matins like two pigeons. But just because I
bring them together, they must turn up their
noses to each otherstand back to backone
ready to cry, the other tosacre. I'll lock
him up the rascal and keep him on bread and
water. Louis!'
`Sir!'
`You turn and say sir, as demure as if you
had done nothing to offend me.'
`I am indeed innocent of the intention,
father
,'
said the young man surprised.
`But you
have
offended me.'
`Then I am exceedingly sorry, sir.'
`Sorry is not enough. You must do as I
wish you to do.'
`Certainly, sir. Your will shall always be
my own.'
`Very well, sir. Come to my room by and
by. I leave you here with your cousin.
Entertain
her boy,' added the Marquis in better
humor: `ah, you lucky dog, if when I was a
young man of your agebut never mind;
look after your cousin, and show her the
prospect
with the spy glass. Josephine I leave
you to Louis's care. You will come to
dinner
together, when you hear the chateau bell
ring. Adieu, mes enfans!'
The Marquis de Fernay, then quit the
balcony
by the oriel window leading from it,
leaving the cousins alone. For a few
moments
they stood in the attitude in which we
have described them. The tears which had
filled Josephine's eyes and which her pride
restrained from falling, were forced back into
their surcharged fountains, for wounded pride
will quickly dry a dewy eyelid and restore
the fire to the eye. Louis still kept his back
towards her, though with a side glance
observing
her, and began to hum an air in the
last Opera.
This young gentleman who chose to make
himself so agreeable just now, was the only
son of Le General the Marquis De Fernay,
one of the eldest families of the
ancient
regime
.
His father had, like all his ancestors,
distinguished himself in military life, and
rose to the highest rank therein. He had
now retired from active service to his
chateau
,
there to pass the remainder of his days.
Hospitable and convivial, he found sufficient
society in that of the neighboring barons of
the better classes of the citizens of Calais,
as well as in the occasional presence of his
son and niece. Louis had exhibited an early
prediliction for the sea, originated and
cherished
by his vicinage to the ocean, and at a
suitable age, the Marquis placed him on board
of a ship of the line commanded by his own
brother, Admiral Fernay. Louis became at
once enthusiastically attached to his
profession
,
and at the age of nineteen, a year after
his admission into the Navy, he was regarded
as one of the most promising youths in the
service. He was handsome, frank, and full
of that daring spirit which ensures success,
as well as promises a life of danger. His
uncle, the Admiral, was a man of stern and
cold character, and had little sympathy with
those beneath him in rank, or with youth.
He had taken occasion in several instances
to reprove his nephew with that licence of
lauguage which relationship is supposed to
allow, but which Louis's spirit did not fail
deeply
to feel. He became prejudiced against
his uncle, and took no pains to suppress his
dislike to him. This increased the
tyrannous
exercise of power on the part of the
former, which at length rose to such a height,
that Louis asked and obtained leave to be
transferred to another ship of war. But
before
he had taken his departure, an attack of
appolexy carried off the Admiral, and in him
the only enemy Louis had on earth. This
occurred two years before he is now
introduced
to the reader, on a brief leave of
absence
from his ship of war, which was
attached
to the squadron of Admiral D'Estaing,
destined to the American states, then
struggling
for their independence, and with which
France had just formed an alliance. D'Es
taing's squadron had sailed from Toulon, and
was to be joined at Gibraltar by a fleet of
transports of troops from Havre and Calais,
under the convoy of a line of battle ship and
frigate. To this battle-ship Louis was
attached
as a third lieutenant, and learning that
she would lay off Calais till the troops were
embarked, he had obtained leave to post up
to his chateau, and there await their arrival.
With what impatience he was now watching
for the first lift of the fore yard of his ship
above the horizon, has already been seen.
He had been at home now three weeks, and
notwithstanding the amusements in doors, of
the chase, of the Theatre in Calais, and the
society of his fair cousin, he became ennuied
the first week, and took no pains to conceal
his impatience for the arrival of his ship.
To most young gentlemen the society of
a very lovely girlfor such Josephine
Fernay
certainly waswould have made the
wings of time full swift in their flight. What
could be the cause of this indifference to her
presence, this blindness to her beauty? Louis
himself was a fine looking manly fellow of
twenty-two, with black flowing locks, a large
full dark eye, a noble figure and every way
endowed with powers of mind and person to
captivate and win; and in the presence of
other ladies had more than once deeply
betrayed
the susceptibility of his heart. Yet
his cousin Josephine for all the impression
she made upon him might have been eighty
years old, and lame and blind at that. Now
this was very provoking to the Marquis, who
had determined they should fall in love with
each other and by and by marry.
The youthful Countess Josephine herself
was an enchanting girl of eighteen summers:
with soft hazel eyes in which a hundred little
loves lay sleeping; a brilliant complexion; a
cloud of the richest dark brown hair; a person
beautifully rounded, a neck, hand and foot
that were perfect. Her carriage was light
yet full of sweet dignity, her voice musical
and her heart susceptible. She had great
sweetness of disposition yet was high-spirited
and determinedqualities that marked
peculiarly
the race from which she sprung.
Moreover
,
Josephine had loved Louis when she
first saw him three weeks before, on his
arrival
.
And he had become wholly overpowered
by her beauty at the same instant and was
about to tell her on the spot how romantically
he loved her, when the old Marquis seeing
the impression made upon both by the other's
presence hastened to take present advantage
of the propitious moment, and said with great
joy,
`Ah, boyI knew you would like each
other! I planned it! I had her brought from
the convent where she was at school, on
purpose
to surprise you. Its planned you are to
marry her.'
`Then I shall be sure not to,' answered
Louis quickly and firmly.
`Why what's the matter with the boy?'
repeated
the Marquis with a look of contempt.
`That I do not mean to love or marry to
please other people. This is an affair in
which I shall do all the planning myself,
father
.'
`But I thought you seemed to like her.
Isn't she beautiful?'
`Perfectlybut I won't marry nor care a
fig for her if you have already planned before
hand that I should. I suppose she has a hand
in the plan too.'
`Not a finger tip! It is all my own and the
Admiral's.
`What Admiral?
`Her father.'
`The late Admiral de Fernay! Is this his
daughter?
`Yes, your cousin. Did I not mention her
name!'
`You may be sure then I shall neither love,
marry, nor'
`Nor what?'
`Nor trouble her long with my presence.'
Such was the first interview and
denouement
between Louis and his cousin. He
might in consideration of her loveliness have
got over the fact that she had been `planned'
to meet him and produce an impression upon
him which was to ripen into marriage; but he
could never get over the fact that she was the
daughter of his tyrannical uncle, the
apoplectic
Admiral. He from this time looked upon
her with a sort of mingled fear and dislike.
He could see in her sweet smiles only his
sardonic
ones; in her voice hear only
his
tones.
Her air, manner and presence irresistibly
recalled
the idea of his old tormentor. He felt
her beauty; he was not insensible to her
worth as he saw more of her, and he would
have reasoned himself into the absurdity of
his prejudices against an innocent girl, so far,
at least as to forbear betraying his feelings
to the unconscious object which excited them.
At length he in a measure overcame the
feeling
by nobly and resolutely adopting an
opposite
course of conduct to that which his
emotions of strange dislike would have
suggested
.
In this he had much to overcome,
but he was so far successful as to remove
from her mind those painful sensations which
the sudden change in his manner towards her
had produced. So, that the second week of
his visit he found himself behaving with
tolerable
civility to his cousin; and in his
engaging
presence the smiles and roses which an
undefined fear of having displeased him had
driven from her face, came back again. In a
good-feeling moment, too, he promised the
anxious old Marquis that he would for the
remainder
of his visit endeavor to forget that his
cousin was the Admiral's daughter, and
regard
her only in the light of his father's
amiable
ward.
When alone and reflecting upon these
things Louis could not but acknowledge the
beauty and grace of his sweet cousin and the
claims she presented above all women he had
ever seen to his admiration.
`Oh,' said he when returning to his room
after an agreeable hour in her company on
horseback along the sea-shore, `Oh that my
belle cousin had been any other than my
uncle's
daughter! I can forgive my father's
planning for our union, as it is natural for the
old
noblesse
to wish to retain their lands in
their own families. This is very well, and
the young Countess Josephine's estate would
prove no obstacle. But in all the loveliness
of her looks, when I am ready to throw
myself
at her feet, some slight tone or glance so
irrisistibly reminds me of her father that my
devotion is crushedmy admiration, but for
a strong mental effort, became instant dislike.
This will never do to be haunted so by the
old Admiral! Yet I feel a deep interest in
the fair girlbecause I have discovered that
she loves me!'
Yes, the Countess Josephine passionately
loved Louis. She had heard much of him in
earlier yearsand since her dear father's
death when the Marquis became her guardian,
the fond, partial accounts of his son she often
heard from his lips so awakened her interest
that at length her heart insensibly, as it
often
will in such cases when peculiarly
susceptible
,
became interested in him. In truth
she was taught to love him ere she beheld
him: and, when, at length, this moment
arrived
this pre-created love was confirmed and
sealed as well by his noble and generous
appearance
as by the kind manner and deep
devotion with which her presence first
impressed
him. How deeply then must she
have felt his altered lookshis bearing of
sudden dislike! How her prideher woman's
chaste and holy love upspringing from the
freshly broken soil of her heart and leafing,
budding, expanding into beauty and fragrance
only for his eyehis hand.
Yet that eye turns coldly awaythat hand
crushes the tendrils that sought to reach and
entwine themselves around his heart. Poor
maiden! sad and heavy was her heart till its
own sense of the folly of his prejudices
nerved him with resolution to combat it. Then
she became happier and strove to win the
heart which had already so thanklessly got
possession of her own. In vain the sweet girl
had sought in herself the cause of his
antipathy
.
At length the Marquis told her. From
that moment she resolved, by all the sweet
power a lovely woman can wield with her
heart in the purpose to overcome his
prejudice
and secure her own happiness by uniting
it with his in whose life her own was
irretrievably
wrapped up. Quietly, deeply,
perseveringly
she pursued her object, with pride
and delicacy, yet with the humility of
unrequited
love and the perseverance of passion.
Louis's prejudice lessenedthe
stronghold
of his pride was shaken, and the day
we found him in the balcony, he confessed
to his father, that `if the Countess Josephine
had not that peculiar way of turning the eye,
like the Admiral, when she smiled, he could
love her with all his heart and soul.'
`Let her wear specs,' said the Marquis,
laughing.
`I should see it through a ship's side.'
`Suppose you begin then, by forgiving the
old Admiral heartily. That'll square
accounts
,
and then confound this cock in the
eye of your cousin. You won't care
whether
it's the Admiral's or mine.'
`I have forgiven himeven the blow he
once struck me with the flat of his sword.'
`He was impetuous. But forget too.'
`I cannot, with such a resemblance to him
as my cousin's face would daily call up.'
`Then I see no prospect of the union
without
putting out your eyes or her's.'
`No, I can never marry her, for I can
never
love her. She is a sweet, noble, generous
creatureI have found that outbut I can't
abide the Admiral! But more; now that I
have discerned, she wishes to win my heart.
I find myself fortifying it.'
`Then you deserve to have it carried by
storm, or taken by treachery. You shall
marry your cousin, or I will disenherit you.'
`I am willing to marry my cousin, but I
feel a decided objection to taking the old
Admiral with her. Lay the father aside, and
I'll wed the daughter, that is, if on better
acquaintance
,
we can agree to love each other.'
This conversation took place the day Louis
came to the balcony to look out for his ship,
and it was overheard by the fair object of it.
From that moment she resolved to forget her
cousin, and let her love die in the heart
whence it had sprung. The Marquis who
had long missed her, found her in her room
sad and thoughtful, a few moments before
appearing
with her on the balcony, to which he
invited her for the air and prospect, not
expecting
to find Louis there. His soliloquy,
as we have seen, they overheard, and although
the language of it pained her, Josephine
resolved
not to retreat or betray any emotion.
But her heart was too full to conceal it, and
in her reply, she was forced to laugh merrily
to refrain from weeping, like an April rain.
Never were two young people placed in more
peculiar circumstances than the cousins, on
being left alone on the departure of the
Marquis
,
who resolved to give them one more
opportunity
of bringing about the
consummation
of his paternal hopes.
They remained as we have described them,
Louis with averted face yet watching his
cousin's movements; she in a shrinking,
pensive
attitude, half lingering as love drew her,
to half retreating as pride would have driven
her from him. At length feeling the
embarrassment
of her position in the presence of so
thoughtless a lover, and recalling her
determination
to conquer her heart, she made an
effort to recover her self-possession, and feel
at ease in his presence. Her pride was
wounded that she had suffered him to know
the true state of her feelings towards him,
and she resolved to do away any impressions
upon his mind that she was weak and simple,
or what was equally to be removed, the idea
that she was bold and scheming.
`So, fair cousin,' she said with a powerful
effort that showed the mastery she had over
her feelings, when she would call her power
into exercise; `so you are soon to leave us!
Do you love the sea?'
Louis was surprised at the cool and
self-possessed
manner of this address from one
whom he had known only as timid and
shrinking
,
and turning round he replied with
courtesy
and an irresistible feeling of respect:
`Yes, Josephine; to-morrow or the next
day, with this south wind my ship will be
here.'
`You will find it an agreeable change from
this lonely chateau and its only inmates, an
old soldier and a simple girl, for the deck of
a battle ship with brave men around you. I
am told that sailors love the sea.'
`Yes, cousin, I already feel an affection
for its tumbling waves and wide skies. It
is now my home, and I love it as well almost
as I love the green vales of France. For the
wide sea is even as my native land to me,
when my foot is upon a French deck, and
the flag of France is flung to the wind above
my head,' answered the young man
enthusiastically
.
He advanced a step nearer his cousin as
he spoke, who retreated a step timidly with
down-cast eyes. He felt for a moment vexed,
then pleased, as the idea occured to him that
she was no longer
pursuing
. He looked at
her and thought he never saw her so lovely
but the arch of her eye-brows reminded
him of the appoplectic Admiral, and he did
not
throw himself at her feet! His glance at
this moment caught an object on the horizon,
and springing for the telescope he placed it
to his eye for observation. After looking a
few moments with an earnest manner, he
dropped the glass with an impatient word of
disappointment.
`It is a brigantine, but carrying sail like a
frigate.'
`What did you expect to see?' asked
Josephine
advancing.
`A ship of the line.'
`Look farther southward just coming round
that headland,' she said, looking without the
aid of the glass, and pointing with her glove
in the direction indicated.
`It is the Liner; and astern of her the
frigate
just shows her fore and main royal above
the cliff,' he said, observing them through the
glass. `Confound her' he muttered, `she
is more like the old Admiral than everfor
he was always the first to discover a sail, and
could see farther with his naked eye than any
officer that sailed under him with his
eye-glass
.
No, it is settledI can never think of
her as my wife. I should see the old
Admiral's
head carved on all the four bed-posts.'
`You will not leave us at once,' said
Josephine
,
who had been watching the magnetic
advance of the vessels of war as they sailed
near shore.
`Before night, cousin. Excuse me now. I
must ride to the quay.'
Thus speaking, Louis hastily quit his
cousin
,
and in a few minutes was seen by her,
galloping on horseback along the road to
Calais.'
`Let him go then' she said between pride
and grief; `he has no heartand my love
would wither upon his bosom like the tendrils
of the vine, which in seeking a fair green
tree for support, entwines around some
inhospitable
rock, and there perish.'
CHAPTER II.
After the departure of Louis to the quay,
and when he had finally disappeared from her
view, the young Countess Josephine retired to
her chamber, which overlooked the channel,
to give vent to her mortification alone. She
felt that she fondly loved her sailor-cousin,
and that her happiness was intimately
involved
in the issue of this love. As a woman
she felt wounded vanity, that her charms
produced
upon him so light an effect, and that
her powers of pleasing were not sufficiently
great, to do away from his tenacious mind,
the memory of her father's tyranny.
`I will yet conquer this foolish prejudice
in Louis,' she said with spirit, dashing an
unbidden
tear from her eye, `he has a noble
nature
,
a generous warm heart, and if woman's
love can win it without overstepping the
limits of maidenly beseeming, Josephine de
Fernay shall yet reign its mistress. I know I
have a great task before me, trammelled as I
am by a maiden's reserve, but I do not
despair
one day seeing him, proud and wilful
as he now is, sueing at my feet.'
Thus determining, this gentle girl, in
whom profound and intense love had suddenly
awakened a resolute and active spirit, walked
to her window to watch the progress of the
ships of war, with the movements of which
she now began to feel her own happiness was
so closely interested.
The detached masses of clouds which all
that sultry afternoon had hung low over the
channel, alternately falling in dense columns
of rain, or sailing along with gleams of
sunshine
darting between upon the sea, had now
gathered in a huge embankment above the
promontory which the line-of-battle ship and
frigate were doubling. It was driven across
the sky by a strong south wind, and as
Josephine
looked forth she saw that it covered
half the southwest, and threatened a
thunder
storm. As its shadow swept along the
water, she saw the fishing-boats hoist their
small brown sails, and run for Calais and the
nearest shore; and farther out from land the
large vessels which in great numbers dotted
the channel sailing on all courses, take in
their lighter sails, and signifying their
preparations
for the coming danger.
Turning from them, her eyes watched with
a new and deeper interest the movements of
the ships of war. They were both a full
league to windward, and being nearer the
source of the tempest, the other vessels would
feel it first. She saw, however, that they had
yet made no preparations for it; that the line
ship carried her main and fore-sky-sails, and
that the frigate had everything set from deck
to truck; for the wind was still light and
fitful
.
They were evidently fully aware of the
coming storm, though partly sheltered from it
by the promentory they had just doubled, and
were taking advantage of the little breeze
that blew, to try and reach anchorage ground
in the outer road of Calais, before it should
burst upon them. This was the opinion of
Louis, who seeing the gathering clouds had
reined up about half a mile from the
Chateau
upon a point of land washed by the
waves, to take a view of the vessels and for a
few moments to watch their motions.
Slowly and majestically the line of battle
ship followed by the frigate a cable's length
astern, approached the offing of the Chateau,
and not half a mile distant in a direct line.
Josephine could see distinctly the men
moving
about in her rigging, the officers in
uniform
upon their quarter decks, and at
intervals
as the wind died away the far off cry of
the leadsman as the ships felt their way along
the shore, which in that neighborhood was
rendered dangerous by sunken ledges. She
was so much interested and wrapt up in
watching their progress that she did not take
notice of the rapid and powerful march of the
tempest of clouds which came triumphantly
on, like `an army with banners.' She was
only recalled to it, by the sudden darkness
that grew around her, and a flash and crash
of thunder that shook the rock upon which
the Chateau was founded, till it reeled. The
lightning blinded her for an instant and the
thunder had so confused her senses, that it
was several seconds before she could recover
her recollection and command self-possession
to look around her. When she did so, she
beheld a stream of flame rising like a me
teor from the foremost of the line-of-battle
ship, and darting high into the murky
heavens
which were now all overcast, save a fine
bright space far to leward towards which, the
clouds were driving with wild velocity, their
edges streaming like hair flown out in the
wind. She gazed with silent horror as the
flame grew larger, and shot higher, and its
lurid glare fell reflected in a long red line
across the water. As she looked, she saw it
fork outward, seize the mainmast, and wrapt
it in flames, and then dart like a fiery serpent
along the cordage in all directions till the
whole of the loftier sails and spars of the
majestic
battle ship, were enveloped in fire and
rolling clouds of black smoke that in darkness
and horror seemed to mock the storm clouds
that rolled on above, upon the wings of the
wind.
As yet there had been no wind in motion,
in the lower stratum of the atmosphere, though
the velocity with which the tempest was
sweeping above the channel, showed the
strength of the blast that raged in the region
in which it reigned. The slight breeze which
had held until a few moments before the fall
of the thunderbolt upon the ill-fated ship was
now followed by a profound calmthe sure
precursor of the wild commotion of the
elements
that was to follow; in this silence the
roar and crackling of the flames reached the
terrified maiden, and ever and anon came
shoreward a wild confusion of sounds of
human
voices.
`Ha, the frigate is warping away from her,'
said the Marquis, pressing with energy his
niece's arm, having flown to her chamber on
hearing the near peal of thunder, and
approached
the window undiscovered some
moments
before, where he had stood so absorbed
in the sight of the burning vessel, as to
forget
to address her or give her notice of his
presence until now.
`My dearest uncle,' she cried with
trembling
and gratitude, `I am so glad you are
here. This spectacle is horrible.'
`It is my child! Yet how sublime in its
horror. Oh, the wives made widows this
hour.'
`Will they perish then? Cannot the other
ship save them? Oh, God, let not so many
creatures, made in thine own image, thus
miserably perish in the sight of their haven!'
cried the maiden, lifting her hands and eyes
imploringly to Heaven.
`I fear many will be lost. The frigate is
hauling off from her out of reach of the flames,
lest she may share the same fate. See the
topsails have caught, and the burning masses
are falling upon the deck and into the sea.
Hark! there is a gun! another! They call
loudly for aid that ne'er can reach them!
Another gun! Hark! there peals the thunder,
Heaven's artillery mingling its sublime roars.
What a scene and hour of sublimity. Oh,
this is fearful!'
`Cannot we aid them! See they lower
boats on every side, and they are fast filling
with men! Look! how madly they leap into
them, and methinks as many miss them and
fall into the water as into the boats! What
an agonizing scene! Yet I cannot turn my
eye away, while my heart seems to burst with
its wild efforts to implore Heaven's mercy for
them. Cannot, Oh! cannot, we save them
uncle?'
`No, my child! I, alas, am too old to
venture
in a boat if we had one! You cannot
aid them. Listen! The tocsin is sounded
in Calais! What a glorious glad sound that!
The city is up! And see the frigate's boats
are approaching to their consort's relief with
the speed of all their oars. The most of
them will be saved if the storm withholds its
approach a quarter of an hour longer.'
`Oh, for a prophet's arm and prayer at this
hour to intercede for them and bid it stay!'
cried the maiden earnestly, as her eyes were
cast upon the black heavens, which
threatened
each moment to burst with all their
magazines of destructive elements upon the
hundreds of her fellow beings, now either
combating with the flames or exposed in the
boats.
The fire had now reached the forcastle,
and wrapped it in a sheet of flames. The
boats had all been lowered, as fast as they
were filled with the men, put off at a short
distance from the ship, and there lay on their
oars. The frigate's boats came with timely
relief and took off many others, but ere they
were all rescued, the tempest which had been
seen a few moments before to strike the sea
half a league astern of the vessels, now came
on with a resistless fury, driving before it
perfect cataract of foam many feet high.
Guns were rapidly discharged from the
frigate
,
recalling the boats with their crews,
several of which that were nearest reached it
in time for shelter; but nine boats
containing
four hundred men were still exposed;
and, unable to reach the frigate, rowed,
impelled
by fear, for the shore. Many,
including
the officers, were still on board the
burning
ship with the storm within half a mile,
which rendered almost inaudible the
thunder
.
The frigate had previously taken in all
her light sail and reduced herself to a close
reefed fore and mizzen top-sail and gib. She
had time to get the few boats in, that safely
reached her when the tempest struck her.
She was laying at the instant with her
weather
quarter to the direction of its approach,
and the first shock threw her almost flat upon
her beam-ends, and completely enveloped her
hull in a cloud of foam and spray. She
plunged terribly to recover herself from the
imminent peril of her situation, and after
seeming once or twice as if she would have
foundered bows foremost under the waves
and gone bodily down, she righted, shook off
the showering spray and bending to the blast,
drove before it under her top-sails, without
the loss of a single spar, or the parting of a
rope. This struggle had been witnessed
with deep interest not only by the Marquis
and his neice, but also with the intensest
anxiety by young Louis, who from the
headland
where he had lingered, had seen as well
as his cousin all we have described. The
frigate was soon lost to sight, driving in the
roar of the storm, and now the spectators
from the chatean and the young horseman,
who had remained seated in his saddle,
almost
paralysed at the spectacle of the
burning
battle ship, turned their attention to this
ill-fated vessel.
`Execrations upon the dastards!' cried
Louis, as he beheld from his post several
barges which had come out from Calais to
their relief, put back for the storm.
The ship's boat, loaded to the water's edge,
were pulling from it towards the shore as if
lifeas truly it didhung on every dip of
their swiftly flashing oars. The ship was
now, except the quarter-deck and waste,
enveloped
in sheets of flame. The guns of
distress had long since ceased to be
discharged
.
But the heat now ignited the
powder
,
and those on the forecastle-deck began
to fire themselves as the tempest came on.
The scene was now terrific, too appallingly
sublime for human eyes to endurefor the
human heart to fear! The heavens had grown
black as midnight, and wild with the driving
storm, their agitated surface livid with
excitement
,
lightning its vast concave, echoing
and re-echoing with thunder! The sea for
leagues to the windward, was white with
foam, and mingling its roars with shrieking
winds! The conflagration of the battle-ship
spread a baleful glare on land, water and
sky, and the incessant discharge by the flames
of its heavy ordonance, with the shouts of
despair or encouragement that were heard at
intervals, added new terrors to the scene.
In the midst of this reign of death and
horror
,
the officers of the battle-ship had all
retained
their coolness and self-command.
Their attention had first been given to the
safety of the men, and their authority had
been only exercised to this end, when it was
discovered the conflagration could not be
stayed, and that the flames were rapidly
enveloping
her. They had seen all the boats
filled, and ordered them to lay off at a safe
distance to await the issue. Thus the storm
which they trusted would hold back a while,
was close at hand, and threatening to fall
upon them before they had taken any thought
of themselves. There were seventeen officers
including the commodore, and eighty men
still on board; the latter crowded fearful,
yet under discipline, upon the quarter-deck or
in the waist. There were two more boats
still attached to the ship, one afloat and the
other a life-boat, in the mizzen rigging. In
a few minutes they felt that their fate would
be sealed. They saw the boats on all sides
hastening to the shelter either of the frigate
or the land, and the commander, with
emotion
,
gave orders for deserting the brave ship
he had commanded in so many battles. The
order was obeyed with alacrity, yet without
disorder. The boat was brought along side,
and the seamen ordered to get into it. It held
but seventy.
`Let the remaining ten take the life-boat
with the officers,' said the commander. `Put
off there in the boat and make for the shore
before the storm bursts upon you. Now
launch the life-boat.' It soon floated light
beside the ship. The heat now became so
intense, and the danger grew so imminent
from the blazing spars and canvass, that fell
in showers about them, that the officers and
men were instantly ordered to enter the boat.
`I will be the last man on the deck of Le
Minerve. Come, my child,' he said, taking
in his embrace a lovely girl of nineteen, who
had hitherto been reclining as he gave his
orders, almost insensible upon his shoulder.
`Oh Henrithe prisoner! the prisoner!
oh, my father,' she shrieked. disengaging
herself from him and clinging to a stay with
both hands. `Will you be so cruel as to
murder him thus.'
`Nogood God, no! I had forgotten him.
He is confined in the gun-room! Who will
release him. If a seaman, he shall have a
hundred louido'rif an officer, promotion.
`A brand has fallen against the magazine
door, and half burned it through,' exclaimed
a sailor, returning with breathless terror.
`Then he must perish,' cried the com
mander; into the boat all, and pull for your
lives. De Saussuse, take my daughter from
me!'
`No---no---he shall not perish,' cried the
young lady with determined energy.
And as she spoke she broke from her father
and the officer who was lifting her into the
boat, and flew across the heated deck amid
the roar of guns, the crackling of flames and
the terrors of so appalling a scene as that
wild conflagration presented. She
descended
into the sumptuous state cabins now
deserted
and in confusion, and opening a
trapdoor
,
descended still farther to a deck below.
She heard the voice and footstep of her
frantic
parent in pursuit, and dropped the
trapdoor
leaving herself in darkness. Her foot
had trodden there before in silence and
darkness
,
and well she knew how, in danger, to
find the place she sought. She had to go
forward some distance along a narrow
passage
.
The roar of flames, and the thunder
of canon above and around her was fearful,
yet she trembled not.
`No, he shall not perish, or I perish by his
side, she repeated energetically. The air
was close and hot, and charged with smoke,
so that it was with difficulty she could breathe.
Still she pursued her intricate way to the
gun-room. Suddenly a fearful shock
convulsed
the huge fabric of the ship to its
centre
,
and the upper decks above her head were
torn open their whole length, and the confined
atmosphere rushing out ignited with instant
combustion. The masts had fallen, carrying
the decks with them! For an instant she
stopped to recover from the shock, and then
darting down a ladder, flew across the
gundeck
,
her way lighted by flames darting into
the port-holes, and came to a door in an
oaken
wainscott. To her surprise it was
unbarred
and open.
`Oh Henri! Henri! she shrieked, with a
cry between joy and hope.
`Madeline, bless God, is it you who have
made this sacrifice for me?' answered a young
man who was lying in an open cell chained to
a bolt.
`And should it not be me, from whom you
have been thus cruelly confined! Come, fly
with me! Life hangs upon a thread! The
ship is in flames!'
`So a seaman informed me, who, humanely
as he fled by, threw open my door; but I
could not move! Fly, dear Madeline. Save
your own life, and leave me to perish!'
`I live only in youand if you die I die!'
`This is madness.'
`Let me see your chains. They are
fastened
to this bolt. Let us with our united
strength try and draw it from the deck. See,
it is loose, and may yield!'
The words of hopethe love of life, inspired
him, though against hope, to make the effort.
Once, twice,
thrice
, was their combined
strength exerted, and the fourth time the bolt
yielded!for love and life are strong.
`Now flywe may yet live for each other!'
cried the noble girl taking him by the hand,
and dragging him from the spot. `Fly, for
the conflagration has reached within a few
feet of us. A moment's delay, and we are
both lost.'
The young officerfor such his uniform
bespoke
himsmiled faintly as the red glare of
the flames shone through the door, upon his
features, and he pointed to his fetters.
`See, Madeline, I cannot walk. My feet
are chained together!'
`My cruel father!' she cried in despair.
`But you must not perish. No, no! I have
strengthI have energyI will bear you
hence in safety.'
`No, rather let me die here. Save your
own dear life, while there is yet time.'
`Only with your life do I save my own, she
answered decidedly. `I am strongGod will
aid meI will save you! Come, dearest
Henri, let me bear you in my arms.'
`And whither?' he asked, between doubt
and despair. `Hear the roar of the flames!
feel the heat of the deck above us!hark!
the gun within ten feet of us has discharged
itself!how can you
alone
, how can we
both
escape but to perish in a watery grave!'
`The life-boat is waiting. My father would
never leave the ship without me! I can bear
you along the decks as I came! The flames
may burn methe heat may scorch my face
but I shall heed nothing so that I save you.
Oh, Henri, if you love me, yield!'
`I do,' he answered as a loud crash told the
falling in of a portion of the main deck: `
Heaven
nerve you to the task, noble creature.'
`Love never doubts,' she answered, taking
him in her armsfor confinement and illness
had made him lighter than he otherwise would
have been. The burden was heavy, but
energy
and resolution with the thought of all she
was striving for, made it light. Bearing him
along the deck by the way she bad come she
reached the ladder in safety. This he
ascended
himself with ease without her aid. On
gaining the next deck she found the tempest
had burst upon the ship, and that the flames
of the crushed decks which she expected to
have to meet were extinguished by deluges
of spray that broke over the ship and poured
in torrents into the holds. The roar of the
hurricane was now deafening above and
around them, and instead of smoke and fire,
the heroic girl with her burden had to force
her way by wading along the decks in deep
water. She however, was undismayed, and
thanking heaven for this temporary
suspension
of the conflagration in her pathway, she
retraced her steps towards the foot of the
ladder
leading to the trap door of the state cabin
by which she had first descended. But here
she encountered new flames from the fierce
effects of which her loose garments, thrown
around her face and that of the helpless and
fettered young man, in a measure protected
her. At every foot-fall as she advanced she
could feel the ship rock and heave beneath
her as the storm shook its massive frame, and
momently she feared it would part and
engulf
them. She reached with him the ladder
and the state room in safety.
`Now one more effort and we are upon the
quarter deck and shall know our fate,' she said.
`Nay, Henrithis is no time for you to say I
shall carry you no further.'
`The ship reels as if she were foundering,'
said the young man, with energy; `Oh these
fetters that make me at this hour dependant
for life on one who needs my protection for
her own safety. Cannot you find me a file,
Madeline? I would die at least free.'
`Before you could use a file we should
perish
.
Here, oh, here are the keys! Behold!
Now you are free!' she joyfully exclaimed,
her eye having caught sight of several
bunches
of keys hanging over the captain's transum,
one of which she knew was that entrusted to
the keeper of the prisoners, and flew to obtain.
`Thank God for this mercy,' said the youth
as he discovered among them several keys for
fetters He tried oneit would not fit the
ward of his own;another and another with
equal want of success.
`Will Heaven let you perish with liberty
and life thus within your grasp,' she cried
with anguish; `come, let me bear you to the
deck, and if my father has deserted me we can
at least die, as he has forbid us to live
together
,'
she cried, embracing him passionately.
`No, we shall both yet live and be blessed,
dearest,' he joyfully exclaimed as the trial of
another key proved successful. `
See! I am
free!
' and casting aside his heavy chains he
stood upon his feet and caught her to his heart.
`Now,
now
, I am to be your preserver, not
you mine!'
She clasped her hands with gratitude, and
falling upon his shoulder wept the full tide of
her joy. Thus he raised her up and hastened
with her to the deck.
Fearful and wild beyond description was the
scene that met his eyes. The sea around him
was boiling with foam, and the mad wind was
sweeping over it with a deafening roar! The
skies were black as midnight save when riven
by the forked lightning, and the mingled
thunder
and wind and roar of the waves formed a
sound such as human ears had never before
heard. No land was visible for the murky
gloom that made sky and water seem to meet
close around them. Through this empire
of the king of the tempests the hull of
the line of battle ship was driving furiously;
rolling this side and that like a drunken man,
but still plunging onward to its destiny. The
masts, sails and spars had all been consumed,
and the bowsprit and bows were only now on
firethe sea, which had been swept over her
at the onset of the storm, having put out the
conflagration further aft. The flames of the
bows instead of ascending or turning towards
the stern were driven straight forward by the
force of the winds, notwithstanding the
velocity
at which the ship herself was driven.
On the quarter deck all was confusion and
rum, and the charred deck and bulwarks,
showed that those who had last stood there
had fitally been driven from it by the flames,
before they were extinguished by the waves.
The young man having taken a hasty view of
the scene and his position, felt that there was
now little chance of lifefor he knew the ship
in those waters could not drive far without
going ashore, and shipwreck in such a storm
presented few chances for escape. He sighed
as he gazed upon the pale and exhausted girl
who had risked so much for his safety, and to
whom he now owed his life. She looked up
and raised her head from his shoulder, upon
which she had leaned insensible since he had
left the state room with her, and as divining
his thoughts said, as he bent his car closely to
her lips to catch the words in the noise of the
storm.
`Fear not, Henri, God has not given me
courage and strength to save you to permit
either you or I to perish now. We shall both
be saved. But my poor father!'
`The life-boat is not aboard! He probably
left the ship before the chances of safety were
quite gone. Be not apprehensive for him
for a life-boat will live even in so terrific a
sea as this.'
`I have no hopes,' she answered
despondingly
.
`He has perished. There were
many in the boatand with him have
perished
this day all who two hours since sailed
with us in hope and pride. How many
gallant
men will lie in the deep sea to-night
whose voices and foot-tread were but now
heard on this deck.'
`All may be saved! Think only of your
own preservation now,' said the young officer.
`We seem to be the only persons left in this
mighty fabric which has become the sport of
the wild winds and waves. Let us secure our
self-possession and be prepared to take
advantage
of whatevor opening for safety
Providence
may point out.'
His words gave her fresh energy, and after
hiding her face a few moments longer to
commend
herself and him she loved so well, to
God, she stood up beside him and calmly
surveyed with him the sublime spectacle of the
tempest through which they were driving as
if impelled by the wings of destruction.
Above them, around them, before them, all
was one elemental chaos. By degrees the fire
from the bows ate its way aft and reached the
bulwarks about the gangway. This was a new
subject for alarm. Hitherto there had been
no rain amid the stormfor the violence of
the windy tempest drove the water in sheeted
rain horizontally through the upper regions of
air ere it could fall upon the sea. But now it
began to descend with great vehemence and
soon completely deluged the decks and
extinguished
the flames which had again
become
a source of painful anxiety. It drove
them for shelter to the helmsman's house, a
strongly built covered shed, and here they
remained
calmly waiting the fearful issue. Night
was rapidly setting in and both expected it
would be their last on earth. Seeing her
perfectly
comfortable in her narrow quarters,
from which was visible the whole ship and
sea before her, the young officer left her to
examine the compass and found that they were
driving N. E. by E.
`You say we were near Calais, dearest
Madaline
,'
he asked, `steering parallel with the
shore, when the ship took fire by the
lightning
?'
`Yes. I was in my state room at the time,
and hastened on deck. There was a large
chateau close to us, not half a mile distant,
and I could see the towers of Calais over the
land.'
`Then we must now be near the Hague and
driving into the North Seafor on this course
we should otherwise have driven ashore long
since. If the ship's bottom is sound and we
safely weather the head land of Zuyder Zee
we may be, if the gale lasts, wrecked in three
or four days on the coast of Denmark.'
This calculation was cooly made and stated
with frankness to the companion of his
danger
,
by the young man. He had hardly
communicated
it to her, however, before the rain
which had beat against their shelter behind,
came suddenly in their faces.
`The wind has chopped round,' he cried
`and we shall stand a chance of being
wrecked-on
a coast at least nearer home.'
The ship herself now began to labor heavily
and shear as if struck by a head sea, and he
felt satisfied that the wind had shifted to the
opposite quarter, as it often does in an instant
in violent hurricanes. The sea which had
been raised by the former direction of the gale
now being beaten back and agitated by
conflicting
force, became confused and
tumultuous
,
and tossed the hull fearfully as it strove
to make head against it. The young officer
now saw by the compass that their course was
changed and that the unwieldly mass on which
they depended for safety was driving south
west. He saw this would bring them land in
the vicinity of Calais if they did not before.
He cheered the noble girl by his side with
assurance of safety, and after having brought
her from the cabins such refreshments as he
could find, they remained watching the storm
which had increased in violence from its new
quarter, and trying, which poor human nature
finds it hard to do in danger, to put their trust
in Providence for a safe deliverance from the
imminent peril of their situation.
From the window of the chateau the
Marquis
de Fernay and his niece, and from his
saddle upon the height upon which he had
halted, Louis, had seen the progress of the
storm. The former as we have seen beheld
the frigate driven out of sight into the gloomy
shades of the tempest, and turned all their
thrillingly wrought attention to the fate of the
line-of-battle-ship. The Marquis with a glass
beheld the two last boats lowered into the
water
and the group of officers about her. He
had also informed Josephine that a female in
white leaned upon the arm of the
commanding
officer, whose rank he recognised by his
uniform.
`Ah, there is some commotion,' he said
earnestly; `I see one boat is filled with men
and putting off while the other delays and
there is a rushing to and fro.'
`Do you see the lady still?' inquired his
niece.
`No. She is no longer visible. The
commander
is also disappeared. How madly they
delay. The flames are approaching them on
one side and the tempest is almost upon them
upon the other. Yet they linger. Oh, that
they would escape! Now I see the
commander
again. Two of his officers and his men are
forcing him into the boat'
`And the lady, uncle?' asked the young
Countess breathlessly seizing his hand.
`She is no where to be seen. They have
forced their officer down into the boat and
have left the ship. The poor lady, I fear me,
has somehow perished. 'Tis a fearful scene.
The boat has left her, and now all the crew,
full five hundred men, are upon the water
striving for life in open boats. God be their
preserver! Hark, that fearful thunder crash!
How dread that roar of the wind! See the
sea lift its angry mane and lash itself into
foam! Look! the boats! how they are tossed
and the waves leap over them? Hark to the
shrieks!' cried the Countess sinking upon her
knees, `Oh, God! what a moment of agony!
There has one boat filled with living men
gone down! Another has disappeared! See!
a cannon ball from the ship itself has sunk a
third! But four survive! There disappears
another! Merciful heaven! spare thy
creatures
!'
`Let us fly niece! This is too dreadful!
Let us fly to the chapel and pray for them,
and afterwards when the storm will permit,
hasten with aid to the shore. Alas! see the
sea is sheeted with foam and in the warfare of
the elements none are longer visible, yet, I
trust all will not perish in such fearful
misery
!'
With these words the Marquis dragged his
niece from the window to which they had
both till now lingered with that fascination
which irresistibly and unaccountably binds
the senses to the contemplation of scenes of
suffering and horror from which the heart
shrinks and under which reason totters.
CHAPTER III.
Towards midnight the gale before which
the wreck of the line-of-battle ship had been
driving for so many hours, now in the
direction
of the north sea, now back again upon
her former course, began to lull. The spray
ceased longer to dash over the stern and fall
upon the deck where the young prisoner and
the maiden were sheltered, and the ship
rolled
less heavily, as the waves gradually sunk
to repose. At one o'clock in the morning the
hurricane had terminated and Henry with
pleasure informed his companion that the
clouds were breaking in the north-west, and
that their chances of safety were now secure.
With deep interest they now watched the
clearing away of the approaching clouds, and
as the heavens became lighter their hopes
brightened. While they were looking abroad
upon the sea which now heaved and broke
into waves which momently grew less in
size; the full moon suddenly broke through
the dark masses of clouds above their heads,
and shone brightly down upon the sea. Its
bright beams continued to shine for a moment
only, when they were withdrawn; but it was
the smile of hope to their hearts and they
drew from it an omen for their safety but alas,
not to prove so to both of them!'
At length the storm cleared away and the
moon ruled in the heavens' and lighted up tke
sparkling sea with a brightness that seemed
like that of noon-day, contrasted with the late
gloom and horror that prevailed over sky and
ocean.
`Look hither, Madeline,' said the young
man who had taken a stand upon a gun upon
the quarter-ceck which overlooked the
bulwarks
;
`there is land and from the direction
of it, it is France; but whether south or east
of Calais, I cannot tell. It is not more than
a league distant. How fortunate that we were
not driven upon it in the midst of the gale!
We should inevitably have perished.'
`What bright light like a rising star is that
so near the sea?' asked the young girl.
`It is a light-house. Ah there is another to
the east. I know these lights. We are near
Calais; the centre one is its harbor light.'
`It is not far.'
`Not five miles. But we have no chance
of reaching that port unless taken off by some
boat or vessel. I find the ship is drifting
shorewards very rapidly, and there is some
danger yet from breakers. If she should drift
with this heavy landward roll upon a rocky
beach the ship would certainly go to pieces.
She is very much strained in her timbeas and
I find on just sounding the well that she has
five feet of water in her hold. She may
founder
ere we reach the shore, or go to pieces on
striking it. I acquaint you, dear Madeline
of these dangers that you may nerve your
mind to meet them.'
`I thank you Henri; but I have little hopes
of escaping with life. I feel my heart heavy
with foreboding, and all my hope which in
the midst of the storm buoyed me up has died
within my bosom. We shall never be saved.'
`This is superstition, dearest, and you should
not let such feelings fill your mind at such a
time, when all the energies of your soul are
called for. Every man who has been saved
from danger, has saved himself by the
combined
exercise of hope and action. See how
rapidly the ship drifts. The outlines of the
heights can be distinctly seen. See to the
south there is vissible the towers of some
building.'
`It is, I think, the same chateauyes it is
that was abreast of us when the lightning
struck the ship. Yes, there are the faint
towers
of Calais to the east. Strange that the
storm should have driven us so wildly away
from the spot and then left us here again.'
`Yes, I can see Calais distinctly with the
moonlight reflected from its turrets. There
are lights moving in yonder chateau. Perhaps
your father may have been saved and is now
there.'
`No, no! Some painful emotion tells me
that he has perished. The same sensation
forewarns me of my own death. Henri, dear
Henri, I shall never tread yonder shore.'
`Do not give way to such fancies,'
answered
the young officer, tenderly embracing her.
`We are now within two-thirds of a mile
drifting towards a rocky headland not far from
the base of the chateau. I will now fire the
upper deck guns at brief intervals as a signal
for succor. A boat can live, the water is so
smooth between these headlands, and if they
put off from the shore before we strike, we
shall be saved.'
`And if we strike?'
`We shall strike very heavily and I fear go
to pieces. In this alternative I must save
your life as you have done mine.'
The maiden was silent and the young
officer
saw her clasp her hands in prayer as he
left her to get a match and powder for
priming
the guns he intended to fire to bring aid.
There was, indeed, most imminent hazard in
remaining on board the wreck until she
struck; for there was a heavy landward roll
on which she went surging and laboring now
and then pitching violently, and threatening
each moment to founder. The young sailor
feared either alternative, and began to feel as
the crisis approached, deeply solicitous for the
safety of the life of one who was so dear to
him. These two youthful persons partners in
such a peril, were not only lovers but were
betrothed. Henry Monteith was the son of a
Scotish gentleman of fortune who had resided
long in France, having purchased an estate
adjoining that of Captain Navarre, the
commander
of the line-of-battle ship Le Menerve.
His son was an officer in the British Navy and
during a period of amnesty, visited his father.
He there accidentally beheld Madeline
Navarre
,
and found means to become acquainted
with her, though secretly, for Captain
Navarre
not only secretly had a singular dislike
from some cause or other to Scotchmen, but
he had managed to quarrel with his neighbor
about certain land-marks. Therefore, Henry
Monteith who very soon won the affections of
the lovely Madeline, had to keep his love
secret from her father till such time as he
could claim her for his own, which he
resolved
to do when he should get a first
lieutenancy
,
he being then a third lieutenant. Thus
their true loves run smoothly. Henry making
two cruises and returning at the end of each
to renew his vows of affection. At length
war was declared against France by England,
and Admiral D'Estaing was ordered with a
fleet to America, to help the colonies to
achieve their independence. The Captain of
Le Minerve received his orders, and informed
his daughter that he should take her with
him, hinting at the same time his suspicions
of Henry Monteith. Madeline had nothing
to do but silently acquiesce and then secretly
to send word to her lover, who was at his
father's, who had the same day received
orders
from the French Government to retire
into the interior. This intelligence filled the
young suitor with grief, while it inspired him
to action.
He had a private interview with her and
was made happy by her consent to fly with
him the next day to the altar, leaving her
father and all else for his sake. The hour
was appointed for the flight, and Henry made
his appearance at the mansion of his
lady-love
to receive her. It was deserted and shut
up and to an inquiry put to an old servitor
who was in charge, he was told that Captain
Navarre and his daughter had gone on board
the line of battle ship le Minerve the evening
before, and that she was to sail the next
morning
.'
`This is sudden,' said the surprised and
distressed young man on hearing this
astounding
intelligence.
`Yes;' answered the old servitor dryly,
`but the captain got wind of some
Englishman
lurking about here to run off with his
daughter, and so he thought he'd take her on
board, as the safest place.'
`Not if I had a good British frigate to lay
alongside of her,' thought the chagrined
lover
,
turning away from the old man who, from
his demeanor he believed knew both himself
and his object.
Henry Montieth was not a man, however,
to be defeated by obstacles in the pursuit of
an end so dear to his heart as that he had in
view. He formed his plan and proceeded to
put it into execution. Purchasing the hat,
coat and sword of a boarding officer, which
he put on over his own undress uniform, he
walked down to the quay and boldly calling
for a custom house boat he leaped into it and
bade the oarsmen pull him on board the
Minerve
.
The men obeyed without a word and
rapidly the barge approached the line of battle
ship, which lay off at anchor a mile and a
half from the city in full sight of the quay.
Pleased at the success thus far of his
exceedingly
bold and skillful step the young man
encouraged the rowers, till at length they
came near the Minerve and were hailed from
her forecastle.
`Custom House boat, with a message to
Captain Navarre,' returned the young man.
`Pull away men, and bring me without
delay
alongside the gang-way.'
A rope was thrown him, and quitting his
boat with the order for his men to lay off on
their oars, he soon stood upon the ship's deck.
A midshipman received him and conducted
him to the state room where he beheld Captain
Navarre seated writing.
`An officer of the customs with a message,
sir,' said the midshipman bowing and then
stepping aside for Henry to advance.
`Well, sirdeliver it. I am getting ready
to sail and am occupied each minute,' said the
the captain without looking up, though our
young hero's face was unknown to him.
`A schooner has just got under way in the
upper part and as some suspicions are
attached
to her the captain of the port would esteem
it a favor if you would bring her too and not
let her put to sea. She is beyond the range
of any of the port guns.'
`This is a singular request to make of the
captain of one of his Majesty's line of battle
ships,' answered Captain Navarre looking at
the speaker. `Where are his own armed
schooners to look after such suspicious craft?'
`Put to sea this morning in chase of
smugglers
.'
`Very well, I will give orders. What is
her name?'
`The Madeline.'
`Eh! Why that's the name of my
daughter
.
Do you hear that, child,' he called
towards
an adjoining state-room; `some pirate or
smuggler has named his vessel after you, the
scoundrel.'
`Sir,' answered the young lady who having
heard her name repeated by Monteith in his
own tone (for this beloved name had been
purposely
given by him that he might speak it to
reach her ear,) and half-doubting,
half-believing
his presence, she came bounding forth
from her room. Her eyes instantly met his
and recognized him. Her color fled and
sudden
trembling seized upon her. He gave her
a look of caution and intelligence and she
recovered
herself before her father discovered
any thing to arouse suspicion.
`I said,' repeated Captain Navarre, `that
this officer has been sent in behalf of the
Customs
to request my services in stopping a
vessel
which bears the name of Madeline. You
heard him for he called the name loud enough.'
`Yes, sir.'
`I'll stop the vessel and blow her out of
water
for daring to take your name. Tell the
captain of the port so, sir.'
`Yes sir,' answered the young man who had
interchanged several glances of hope and
encouragement
with Madeline, who each
moment
trembled lest he should be detected.
`That is your daughter, sir.'
`Yes, what then?' gruffly answered the
captain
,
looking at the speaker with a scowl.
`I am glad to have found her, sir.'
`Found her, sir? What do yo mean, sir.
She has not been lost, though it's not her own
fault she wasn't.'
`I meant to say, sir, that I discover in her
the owner of this bracelet which a lady
dropped
yesterday evening on the quay. I was so
fortunate as to pick it up, and before I
could follow her to inform her of her loss and
return it she had disappeared. I now
recognize
this young lady to be the loser. Here is
the bracelet, Mademoiselle.
`You are an honest person. You must have
lost it coming down to embark, Madeline.
Strange you have not missed it. It is my
daughter's bracelet, I recognize it. What
reward
shall I give you?'
`None other sir, than the honor of
reclasping
it upon the fair wrist to which it
belongs
.'
`Let him, girl,' answered the captain
laughing
,
seeing that she turned pale and retreated.'
`It is a reward easily paid.'
`Permit me this honor, lady,' said Henry,
approaching her where she had arrested her
retreat, (shall we say designedly?) at some
distance to the right of her father and near
her own state-room door. He knelt with his
back to the captain who, taking up his papers
again, did not watch them, and fervently
pressing
his lips to her hand, he added in a quick
low tone,
`I was at my appointment and learned you
had been removed hither and in this disguise
have sought you.'
`Oh, Henri, you will be lost. How could
you be so rash! My father will suspect who
you are? Fly!'
`Could I think of myself! To-night I will
have a boat beneath the state-room window.
Have a rope let down by which I can ascend
and I will draw up a firm ladder made of
wooden
cross pieces I shall provide, by which you
can firmly and easily descend with my
assistance
into the boat.'
`We shall be discovered and then`Oh, no,
no! This place is too wild. I could never
reach your boat from the lofty windows at the
stern. Nolet me go with my fatherand
save yourself. We shall meet again in
America
.'
`I am resolved to secure your escape,
dearest
.
We are drawing the attention of your
father. I will be at the stern to-night when
you hear four bells struck. Your clasp has
been bent and comes together with difficulty,
lady,' he said in a loud tone. `I did not think
to make this use of your gift, dear Madeline,'
he added smiling. `Depend on me and be
true!'
`You are long, sir officer,' said the Captain
who for a moment had forgotten them, and
now turned round to see what was the reason
of the officer's delay.
`Yes sir; it clasped with some difficulty.
The lady is very grateful, sir.'
`No doubt, no doubt; women think much
of such baubles. You have a foreign accent
to your French!' he added, eying him
sharply
.
`Yes. I was educated partly by an English
tutor, and he spoiled my vernacular.'
`Humph! The English spoil everything.
If it had been a Scotchman he would have
spoiled you altogether.'
`Yes, sir. You will bring the schooner
to.'
`Aye. The Madeline, you say. The
scoundrel
!
I'll have him under my lee, and her
captain swung at my ship's yard-arm, if I find
any wrong in him. I detest suspicious
characters
.'
`So do I, sir.'
`I hate spies and smugglers and
Scotchmen
.'
`You have reason to, sir.'
`Now go on shore and tell the Post-Captain
I shall certainly oblige him, and give him my
respects.
`Yes sir.'
Thus replying, our successful lover quit the
state cabin of the Minerva, leaving her
Captain
busy at his desk as he found him, but
with an uneasy suspicion of something wrong,
he knew not how or where, but he connected
it vaguely with the schooner, which he
began
to believe had something to do with his
daughter's elopement, if it did not actually
contain the young Scotch lover himself.
`Yes, he said throwing down his pen, I see
into the whole of it. I have got my suspicions
on the right scent, which something in the
words of this custom house officer roused.
Yes, the schooner that he says has suspicious
movements, has got underweigh with some
object in view, with which my daughter is
concerned. That accounts for her strange
movements. I'll bet my head that
Scotchman
has hired her and is lying in wait to run
off with my daughter, or she with him. I see
it. It is a good fortune the Port Captain
should have sent to me. I shall have him right
in my hands! Oh, the villain. Pierre!'
`Monsieur,' answered his servant.
`Say to the first Lieutenant I wish to see
him.'
The officer sent for, made his appearance in
the state cabin.
`Who has charge of the deck?'
`Beauregard.'
`Where is Fernay? It should be his watch.
Send him hither if you please.'
`You gave him permission to join the ship
at Calais.'
`Oh, ah, very true. Go on deck and see if
you see any suspicious schooner coming down
the harbor. Stay! Give my orders to Mr.
Beauregard to bring to every schooner that
attempts
to pass or approach the ship this
afternoon
.
I will be on deck by and by. Go, you
have my orders.
`Yes, I see it. This schooner is going to
carry off my daughter,' he said rising and
pacing the deck. `Yes I've got my suspicions
roused. Madeline,' he called to the maiden,
who had retired the instant Henry Monteith
had left her.
`Sir,' answered Madeline coming in the
state room and looking alarmed and anxious.
`There is a conspiracy on foot, and you at
the bottom of it I suspect.'
The young girl thought she should have
sunk through the deck of the cabin for she
believed Henry had been discovered, and the
whole had been exposed. She was silent, and
it was fortunate that she was, for an unlucky
word might have betrayed her. Her father
continued, and each sentence he uttered,
relieved
her.
`Yes, a schooner is getting underweigh
under
suspicious circumstances. This
custom-house
officer who found your bracelet, came
on board with a message from Mr Perot, the
Port Captain, to advise me of the fact and
desired
me to bring her to. He did not know
what made her suspicious, but
I do
. You
know too.'
`Indeed, sir, I am at a loss,' she answered,
greatly relieved at finding her father did not
suspect Henry, or his plan of escape, but had
got upon another track.
`Well then, this schooner is, I'll be sworn,
under charge of your Scotch lover, and his
plan is to come down alongside with the
evening
tide, and then if he can, get you out of
the cabin here, smuggle you on board, and
leave me to shut the cage door.
Madeline again became embarrassed. She
now believed her father had got some accurate
intelligence, and that to come near in a
schooner
and then send a boat from it, was Henry's
intention. Her heart failed her and she knew
not what to say or do, to maintain her
self-posession
.
She felt all was lost. That the
discovery
had been made, and that Henry would
be taken as in a trap. She rapidly devised in
her thoughts a hundred ways of
communicating
to him information, and preventing the
catastrophe she now certainly foresaw. But
she could decide on none; for she was a
prisoner
without any means or resources at
command
.
Captain Navarre had, however, received no
information, other than Henry himself had
given him, in his invented tale of a suspicious
schooner, which his mind, naturally suspicious,
and now particularly so, on account of his
daughter's late attempt at elopement, conjured
up into a vessel expressly prepared to carry
off his child. These suspicions working in
his active mind, at length produced a result
which came very near the truth.
`I know of no schooner, father.'
`No, perhaps you didn't: but that don't
althe
case. It is not your fault that you did not;
but I have kept you so close that no one could
tell you your Scotch gallants' movements,
unless
a sea-gull flying past the cabin windows.
No, no. I shall watch you sharply until we
get off soundings. Now go to your state-room.
I must go on deck and look for this schooner.
If I catch him I'll put him in irons and send
him to the Bastile.'
Madeline returned to her state-room, where
she gave herself up to unavailing tears for the
fate of her daring lover, whose arrest she now
felt to be certain.
In the meanwhile, the captain went on deck
where he had no sooner arrived, than his
attention
was drawn by his lieutenant to a
schooner with long tapering masts, and a red
and black hull which was slowly moving round
the head of the pier, and laying her course
down the harbor.
`That's the suspicious schooner, my life on
it,' said Captain Navarre, levelling his glass.
`She is not a French build, and her canvas is
English cut. She carries a small green flag
at her fore peak, and sails well. Have a gun
ready to bring her too when she comes within
hearing.'
`There is another schooner getting under
sail, under her lee,' said the lieutenant.
`Yes, I see hera droger for dried fish!
She is not suspicious, M. Beauregard. Keep
your eye only on this fellow with the green
flag.'
`I see a third vessel schooner rigged, and
foreign appearance, abreast the telegraph,'
said the captain looking with his glass; `she
is coming out. She carries a large
top-gallant
sail and heavy main-sail with a red cross
in the centre. I don't know which is the
most suspicious looking, this or the green flag.
Ah, there she sets Sweedish colors. She is
peaceable enoughbesides I see a Custom
House boat just quitting her.'
With intense interest the captain watched
the graceful approach of the schooner first
seen, and which he truly believed had
something
to do with his daughter's presence on
board of the Minerve. Under a light yet steady
wind she came down the harbor, and was
within half a mile of the Minerve, when a
gun was fired at her from a cruiser at anchor
in the current, and then another, but of which
she took no heed.
`By Jupiter, they are trying to bring her up
the harbor. How is it that this Custom House
officer told me the port captain had no vessels
in port. There she fires again at her. We'll
stop the rascal here. Run off with my
daughter
!
Level your piece, M. Bouregard.'
The schooner as she got further out from
the quay felt the wind a point or two more
freely and came down towards the line ship,
parting the waves and heaving the spray
before
her at six knots speed. Gun after gun
was fired from the cruizer, and seconded by
the fort, and the shot threw long wakes of
foam upon the surface of the water, but
without
touching her. She made no alteration in
her course, and the only notice she seemed to
take of it was to set her flying jib.
`She is a bold craft,' said Captain Navarre,
`and means to run past instead of skulking
awhile till dark about us and thenrunning
off with my daughter.' This last sentence he
muttered to himself. `Now he is in range.
Let him have a shot across his fore-foot.'
The thirty-two pounder shook the ship to
the centre in its discharge and the shot was
plainly seen to pass over the schooner, and
strike and bury itself in a bank on the
opposite
side of the harbor, throwing up a large
cloud of dust.
`The gun is too elevated, sir.'
`Mon Dien! charge a lower deck gun blow
her out of the water.'
In the meanwhile, the schooner kept
steadily
on her course and was abeam of the liner
when a second shot struck the water half a
cable's length on the side of her next the ship,
and throwing up the water high into the air,
bound clear over the schooner dive beneath
the surface fifty fathoms beyond on the other
side. The fort and cruizer now ceased firing
leaving the issue to the ship-of-the-line. A
third gun from the lower deck better elevated,
struck the water close beside her and covered
her in a shower of spray, wetting her canvas
forty feet from the deck.
`That must have taken her hull,' said
Captain
Navarre, levelling his spy-glass; `no, it
must have glanced beneath her! She is
taken
care of by the devil! Let me see who is
at her helm and on her decks. By Heaven!
a meer boy is steering her, and a man is
standing
beside him with folded arms looking
coolly
at the ship as if calculating the chances of
being hit by the next shot. I see four men
only on her forecastle. Every thing is hauled
home and in its place! She has a seaman to
command her, if he be what I suspect, cloven
footed. I see tarpaulins on her deeks which
I am sure conceal guns! Let her have
another
shot! she is dead abeam!'
A fifth gun was discharged, and the captain
eagerly watched its effects with his glass. It
struck the head of the bow-sprit, shivering it,
and tore away a portion of the bulwarks, and
passed through the edge of the foresail taking
the boltrope.
`He is vulnerable. Another gun aimed
like that, my men,' cried the captain, `will
bring her to her knees. Charge, and fire
rapidly
,
or she will soon be beyond reach. In
two minutes more she will have passed our
line of fire. It will be a lasting disgrace to
the French marine if she escape. Fire!'
The concussion of the report of the pieces,
made the ship vibrate to her keel. The shot
went far astern of her, richochetting from
wave to wave, tearing and shivering in pieces
a ledge of rocks against which it struck.
Steady, and undisturbed by all the excitement
her presence caused, the schooner kept on her
way, and was soon beyond the bearing of the
ship's heavy ordnance. Captain Navarre
paced the deck like a mad-man at this
discomfiture
.
He gave an order to man boats
and pursue her; but a seven knot breeze
before
which she was now moving seaward,
convinced
him that a chase would only serve to
deepen the mortification of his failure. He,
with his officers, watched her with surprise
and interest as she lessened in the distance,
each lost in his own conjecture as to the
character
of a vessel which had so successfully
eluded the combined force of the cruiser, the
fortress, and a ship-of-the-line. Captain
Navaree
comforted himself, as he saw her
disappearing
to the north-east, hull down, with the
assurance that for the present at least, his
daughter was not to be a passenger in her.
Madeline soon learned the cause of the
heavy
cannonading, but she knew that Henry
was not in the schooner, for she had watched
with a small spy glass from the cabin window
his retiring boat, and seen him land at the
quay, just as the firing upon the schooner was
commenced by the castle and cruiser. She
knew, therefore, that he was for the present
safe, and that so far as the schooner had been
concerned, her father's suspicions had been
wrongly directed.
That night, a little after nine o'clock, a boat,
rowed by six men with muffled oars, put off
from a point of rocks opposite the
ship-of-the-line
,
and rowed towards her. The moon was
within a few nights of its full, and gave a
clearer light than men compelled to muffle
their oar's could desire. Swiftly that boat
came towards the dark mass that lay like a
huge castle afloat.
`What boat is that? challenged the sentinel
from the ganway.
`Castle.'
`Come along side.
`Aye, aye,' answered a cheerful voice which
the expecting, trembling Madeline knew to
be Monteith's. Her father had retired,
locking
her in, and since three bells she had been
waiting between hope and fear, her lover.
How the challenge of the sentinel made her
blood leap! how throbbed her young heart at
the sound of his voice in reply.
The boat came up along side, and Monteith
ascended to the deck, dressed as a French
army officer, and requested to see the captain,
for whom he had important despatches.
Captain
Navarre was informed of his presence
and object on board, and throwing on his
Indian
morning gown, received him.
The assumed officer bowed, and presented
a packet. Captain Navarre tore the seal, and
read as follows:
Sir
You are commanded by the Minister
of War, to give passage to America, to M. St
Clair Lorraine, a Colonel, and bearer of
private
despatches to the Marquis de la Fayette.
Signed
Proveaux
,
Minister of Marine
.
To M. Navarre,
Captain, Line-of-battie-ship Minerve.
`Sir, you are welcome. Monsieur le
minister
shall be obeyed,' answered Captain
Navarre
courteously.
`I will send my boat back, if you please,
and then retire to my state-room,' said
Monteith
in a careless tone.
As he went on deck for this purpose, and
inwardly rejoicing in the success of his
second
ruse d'amour
, a paper fell from his
sword-hilt
to the floor.
`It seems to me, said Captain Navarre to
himself, as he rose to pick it up, `that this
officer's face and voice are familiar. It does
not seem a long time since I have seen and
conversed with him. M. St. Clair Lorraine!
I don't recollect such a name, Ha! `
To Mad
emoiselle Navarre!
' What is this? A note
to my daughter! I must read it. Here is
treason and conspiracy. Who can have the
audacity to write to my daughter?
Dearest Madeline
I find the scheme I
suggested when I was fastening on you your
bracelet this afternoon, wholly impracticable
for many reasons. I have determided to take
passage in the same ship with you as M. St.
Clair Lorraine, bearer of despatches, and
meet my ship in America, where it is to join
lord Howe. I have written for, and shall
obtain
leave, and in the mean time anticipate it.
Betray no surprise or recognition on meeting
me in the morning at table. I look forward
to a happy passage across the Atlantic in your
sweet society. You will think I am an
audaucious
intriguer; but what will not love
undertake
for its object?
Devotedly,
Montieth
.'
It would be impossible to express in
language
,
the astonishment and utter
consternation
of Captain Navarre, on reading this fatal
missile. The identity of the custom-house
officer and the French bearer of despatches,
now flashed upon him. It was several
seconds
before he could speak, for the depth of
his emotions of anger and vengeance.
`Ho, a guard! Seize the spy and traitor'
he shouted, till his voice rung through the
cabin. He flew to the deck, where Henry
having just dismissed his oarsmen was
returning
.
`Ho, you villain,' cried the infuriated
captain seizing his collar, `you Scotch rogue!
you pretty custom-house officer, and bearer
of despatches! I'll have you hung, sirrah. I
have read your note to my daughter! I will
have you guillotined. Ho, seize him and put
him in irons, and take him to the gun-room
prison!'
Montieth knew that all was discovered;
and anathematizing his carelessness in letting
the note he had intended to convvy to
Madeline
be lost, he quietly yielded to his fate, and
suffered himself to be borne from the deck to
his prison.
We have now explained the past history of
the loves of the two persons now on board the
wreck of the Minerve, Henry had been
imprisoned
the seventh day when the
conflagration
occurred, during which time, the faithful
Madeline, by means of bribery, had
repeatedly
visited him. The mode of his release
through her courage and devotion, is already
known to the reader.
CHAPTER IV.
We left Louis de Fernay our French
lieutenant
on his way to Calais, and when a mile
from the chateau, arrested by the
conflagration
of his ship, which, he watched with grief
and horror, until the tempest swept her from
his view, still on fire as she disappeared in the
distance. The reader, however, has followed
her terrific course towards the north sea, and
then seen her driven back again nearly to the
spot from whence she had started, with the
storm abated, and the two lovers, looking
from her deck upon a moonlight scene of bay
and shore, with the chateau in bold relief half
a mile distant; the heavy ground swell
driving
the huge fabric helplessly onwards
towards
the rocky beach beneath it.
Louis did not leave his post on the
headland
till the violence of the gale drove him
for shelter to the nearest roof, which was that
of a deserted fisherman's hut, situated under
the lee and against the cliff. Here he and
his horse found partial protection from the
wild force of the driving blast, while his
bosom was torn with doubt and fears for those
on board the frigate, the few who might still
be on the burning line of-battle-ship, and for
the fate of the boats and their crowded
numbers
.
Anxious to know the worst he made
several different attempts to leave the hut and
return, at least to the chateau, where if any
were saved they would probaby be found
sheltered. But the fury of the wind and the
darkness of the coming night forced him back.
He therefore, though with a sufficiently
important
spirit, made up his mind to be
detained
there until the storm should break up or
morning should appear.
With this view he fastened the door,
unsaddled
his horse and fastening him to a bolt
in the stone chimney of the hut, placed the
saddle upon the floor and laid down using
it for a pillow. The hut was wholly dark
save when a flash of lightning showed him
the wretchedness of his quarters. The
howling
of the hurricane mingled with the roar of
the breakers as they leaped madly against the
side of the cliff which they shook to its
foundations
,
for a time drove sleep from his eyes.
At length slumber stole over him, and sleep
deep and heavy, sealed his senses, lulled
by the monotonous roar of the waves and wind
to which his ear had now become familiar.
How long he had slept, he knew not, when
he was awakened by a loud clap of thunder
and noise of a heavy fall within the hut, that
startled him to his feet. It took him a moment
to recollect where he was and the
circumstances
which had placed him there. The
winds were now still and the roar of the
breaking surges only met his ear. There was
more light too in the interior of the hut, and
looking out from a small wicket window he
saw with pleasure that the clouds were
breaking
up and the heavens becoming lighter,
though still wild and tempestuous. He now
missed his horse and feeling for him, found
he had broken from his fastening by the
chimney
,
leaving a piece of his bridle in the bolt.
The door being still fast, he was surprised at
this and began to search round the sides of
the hut to discover some other opening by
which he might have got out.
He found the place was spacious and
walled
on one side by the cliff, which to his
surprise
,
he found was penetrated by a large
opening. He stumbled over a heavy door
which lay before it upon the ground and which
had evidently fallen from the passage, which
it had been intended to secure, and which had
been thrown down by the shock of the
thunder
clap which had awakened him. He found
by his hands that it was broad and high
enough for the passage of a man, but irregular
in its shape as if a natural fissure in the rock.
His horse, he was confident, must have
wandered
through it and he resolved to explore it
not only in search of him, but to gratify his
curiosity. He drew his sword and carried it
in his hand, for he recollected that smuggler's
infected the coast and that this was probably
one of their haunts.
Listening before he advanced and hearing
no sound save an impotent dash now and then
of his horse's hooofs, which showed him that
his lost companion was not only there but had
penetrated some distance from the hut. With
cautious steps carefully feeling his way with
the point of his sword he advanced in perfect
darkness several feet over a stony floor, the
sound of the sea growing fainter as he
proceeded
further in. The passage was of
irregular
width and was partially blocked up
by a gun pointed outwards which he
ascertained
to be a twelve pounder. At length it
opened wider into a sort of a cavern, which by
the sound of his sword hilt struck against the
sides, he knew was of narrow dimensions;
but a prolonged reiteration of the sound to the
left, showed him that it extended in that
direction
.
He soon found the passage which
by a shallow flight of three or four steps led
him into a large vaulted appartment, for he
knew its size by a sensation he felt of space
above and around him. At the opposite
extremity
he was surprised to see a faint glow
like halfburied embers, and while he was
deliberating
whether to advance further or not,
in such a mysterious place, his blood was
curdled by the rubbing of his horse's nose
against his shoulder.
Smiling at his sudden alarm he caressed
his truant companion and taking his bridle,
led him forward towards the glow worm
looking
spot, which as he came nearer he saw with
pleasure were embers. He was within a few
feet of them when he fell over a human body
that was prostrate in his path. A loud fierce
growl of rage caused him to spring farther
from him, and by a sharp blow with his sword
disengaged his leg which the man had seized.
The horse close behind him was then
evidently
laid hold of by the fetlock as he was
stepping along over him, for such a yell of
surprise and mortal terror as followed the
grasp upon the hoof was never uttered by
human lungs before. It made Louis's blood
run cold. There were a struggle too! The
horse had trodden upon his garments and
held him down, while with yells and curses
he strove in the darkness to disengage
himself
.
`Ha! The devil! ha, the devil! Jacques!
Pierre! the devil has got me at last! Mercie,
Marie! Mercie, Jesu! Sacre! oh, helas, aie!'
Here there was a dying away of the tones and
the voice subsided into a low moan.
Filled with consternation as Louis was by
this unexpected and startling event he could
not help laughing, and hastened to the ashes
to make a light. He found on stirring the
bed of embers that there was a profusion of
hot coals which as he opened them, shed a
glare upon a huge chimney in which he stood
and by which he discovered his horse
standing
quietly over the prostrate form of a man.
By its light he also saw a piece of tarred rope
which had been used as a torch and which he
immediately lighted a bright blaze which it
gave out showed him a large cavernous
chamber
the lofty sides of which were piled with
every sort of merchandize from casks of spirits
to cases of silks and bales of laces, all ready to
be taken across the channel. He was now
satisfied of the character of the place and
reputation
of his new companion. He
approached
the man with the torch, whom he found
lying on his back beneath his astonished steed
who had one hoof upon his jacket. The poor
fellow's face was pale as ashes; his eyes were
closed and his hands clasped over a crucifix,
while his livid lips moved rapidly and
inaudibly
in prayer. The very hairs of his
head were stiffened with his fear and his
body shook with the convulsions of mortal
terror.
Louis gently led his horse from above him,
and then looked at him a moment as he lay
there. He saw he was about forty years of
age, with a bald place in the crown of his
head, and a huge gray beard! He was short
and fleshy, and though coarsely, somewhat
fantastically dressed with an Indian's love
for finery. There was an expression in his
round visage of simplicity and cunning, and
Louis set him down for some half-witted
fellow
belonging to the gang, and left in charge
of their rendezvous. He touched him with
his foot, but he did not stir. He then pricked
him in the ribs with his sword, when he threw
up his short duck legs into the air, and
closing
his eyes tighter, cried out for mercy of
`good Mr. Diabolus.'
`Up, up with thee,' said Louis, sternly.
Open your eyes and get to your feet.'
`The man's fears were somewhat lulled by
the sound of his voice, and his habits of
obeying
made him get so far up as to sit upon the
floor of the cave. Then, with one eye he
looked with surprise at the intruder, and with
the other, surveyed with amusing doubt and
fear the patient horse, who stood near by
contemplating
him.
`Come, sir, get to your feet. Who are you.'
`A good Christian, Mr. Devil, and I hope
you will let me live a little longer. I've got
a good many sins o' conscience to repent of.
Oh, it's pitiful to be waked out of a sound sleep,
with a cloven foot in one's fist. You gave me
a terrible fright, Mr. Devil, so let me off this
time on that.'
`What is the fool talking about. Prick up
your senses. There! do you feel better,
sirrah?' added Louis, lifting him by the neck
to his feet.
`Yes, I think I do. It was only a horse,
then?'
`Yes'
`Then I'll let old Lucifer go to the But
I was a
leetle
taken by surprise; But what are
you and your horse doing here, Mister?' he
demanded in a tone of authority.
`I have come in here for shelter from the
storm.'
`Does it blow, out? Then the boys 'll not
be in to-night. But how did you get in now?'
he asked in a tone of puzzled surprise.
`By accident. Are you alone?'
The man shook his head with a cautious
glance around him and muttered to himself,
`I seehe'll murder me if he knows the
Captain
has left me here!
No
,' he then answered
with more firmness of manner than Louis
believed
he could assume. He, however, knew
that he was deceiving him.
`You are smugglers?'
`No, I am only a `prentice.'
`What are these goods?'
`The King's.'
`What King's?'
`George. You see the Parlyment makes
too hard laws about importin'; and as the
King and royal family likes to wear rich
goods, and the duties makes `em too high for
their purses in these times; so the King
employs
a few vessels to smuggle in what is
wanted at Court, and lends 'em his own colors
and guns, and gives 'em passes, to help 'em
cheat his own cruisers.'
Louis looked at the parti-colored little man
in red jacket, plaid cap and green trowsers,
with surprise and natural incredulity at his
extraordinary statement; yet the seriousness
of his manner, and the connection of his
narrative
with the known fact of the
embarrassment
of, and love of foreign finery displayed
by the English court, could not but lead him
to entertain the belief that he told the truth,
and that he was truly in a
royal
smugglery.
But a moment's reflection, made him aware
of the absurdity of giving credence to so
improbable
a story.
`Who is your Captain?'
`A lord's son.'
`And you yourself are, no doubt, a knight
at the least.'
`Yes. I am knight of the cave here. They
leave me in charge between whiles. They
have been enough gone within the last
fortnight
,
with good luck, to be back again. But
this storm keeps them off. Sacre! I haven't
got over my fright yet.
`Your lungs gave a good account of
themselves
!
You cried out in French. You are
not French?
`No.'
`English?'
`No. I am a Yankee sort from the Bay
State. I was second cook and waitin' man
of all work, aboard Cap'n Jerry Coffin's
'mophridite
brig Fishook, bound to Cadiz, and an
English cruiser took us in charge, thinking
we were not old enough to take care of
ourselves
.
They were all put in Durtmoor hole
but me, and I was let go to pick up my own
livin', coz they said I was a
witless
, and would
harm nobody. Finally, I was smuggled aboard
a smugglin' schooner, and arter they'd made
me do all the work awhile about the caboose,
they put me in here to watch the goods, and
cook for 'em when they came ashore. It's no
honest trade, and so I was easily skeered when
I felt them fetlocks and hoofs about my ears,
and strait away believed it was the Old One.
You are a likely youngster. Where do you
hail from, now, I've told my story.'
`You are not such an idiot as you pretend
to be,' said Louis quickly; `I believe you
assume
a fool's character for your own purposes.
You did it I am sure, to deceive your captors,
and you have done it to try and deceive me.
I am on my guard now.'
The man eyed him sharply for a few
seconds
,
and then said,
`You are a smart one! I am a little
cracked
by natur,' it is true, but my noncompos is
more nor three quarters feigned. I can have
my wits about me, when I'm a mind to
though your pesky horse here, did 'een-a-most
scare 'em clean off forever after more. You're
cute! and let me tell you if you love your
soul-case, to make the best of your way out of
these plantin's rite offfor if the cap'n
catches
you here, it's a gone case with you. Them's
my sentiments.'
Louis was puzzled what to make of his
companion
,
but finally set him down as a shrewd
fool, whose character was compounded of
simplicity
and cunning. By dint of artful
questioning
,
he made out to learn from him, that
this cavern was the depot of a band of
smugglers
,
both French and English, for the
mutual
cheating of the revenues on both sides of
the channel; that freight intended to be
smuggled
into France from England, was first
landed
at night and deposited here, and goods
intended
for the English market, stored here till
required for shipping; that several small
vessels
were concerned in it, and that the illicit
trade was known at Calais by the officer of
the port, but connived at through heavy
bribery
.
That these vessels were well armed and
manned, and often defied the English cruisers,
and almost always escaped them.
Louis himself now recollected having heard
of an organized fleet of smugglers and of a
secret
rendezvous on the coast, but he never
suspected
its vicinage to the chateau; and he
was surprised that its existence should have
so long, perhaps for centuries, been kept
secret
from all but those concerned in the
lawless
trade it so highly favored. He
remembered
,
too, hearing of a celebrated smuggler
who infested the coast, who was singularly
daring, always eluded pursuit and had thrice
beaten off cruisers sent cut to take him; whose
movements were always so sudden and
unforeseen
that they mocked all espionage and
precaution on the part of those who sought to
take him.
`Do you know the name of your chief's
vessel
?'
he asked, wishing to learn if he was in
the haunt of this bold man.
`Some call him Black Ralph.'
`That's the name,' said Louis, quickly. `So!
I have made a discovery that will give a king's
vessel work to do.'
`What's that?' demanded a strange voice in
a stern tone that made him start and look round
with surprise. Near him stood a stout, thick
set man with a seaman's cap and dress, and a
brace of pistols at his belt.
`I meant nothing more than my words,'
answered Louis in the same tone of defiance.
`You have discovered a rendezvous which
is death for any man but a sworn smuggler to
enter. Your words show me that you intend
to make use of your knowledge to betray the
place. This is your horse. You seem to have
been driven hither for shelter.'
`I was,' answered Louis, struck by the bold
and determined bearing of the other.
`You should then have been a guest. You
are now a prisoner.'
`That is to be tried,' said Louis, throwing
himself upon the smuggler and seizing one of
his pistols. There was a momentary but
fierce struggle, pistols were discharged, blood
flowed from the smuggler's arm, and Louis
lay upon the floor of the cave with his foot
upon his breast. His victor surveyed him a
moment by the flickering torch which lay
upon
the ground beside him, and then removing
his foot he said in a tone of singular
quietness
.
`Rise up. You have drawn my bloodbut
I will not take your life. I know you. Your
father did me a service in years past, and I
repay it by giving you your life. Here is
your sword. You are the son of the Marquis
de Fernay.'
`Yes,' said Louis, rising to his feet. `Who
are you that can remember favors at such a
time and in the unlawful pursuit you follow
know how to be generous to the conquered?'
`I am a Frenchman,' answered the other,
coldly.
`That your speech tells me.'
`That is all you need know. Take your
horse and leave the cavern. The storm is
passing over.
`Will you let me depart even without
drawing an oath of secresy from me?' asked
Louis, taking his horse's bridle in his hand.
`He who owes me his life will never
betray
me.'
`You have a high scale of honor for such a
profession.'
`Though a smuggler I am no less a man.'
`I have a desire to know more of you.'
`Your horse is impatient.'
Louis without further questions followed
him as he preceded him with the torch. To
the surprise of the young officer he led him by
a different passage from that by which he
came and which let him forth by a rocky path
that terminated in the sea. Wild and
precipitous
rocks rose above him and hung
threateningly
over the outlet, far into the entrance of
which the spray of the surf was thrown.
`As you came by this way you will easily
return to the upland without further guidance,'
said the man pausing upon a rock his torch
flashing rudely upon the water and ragged
rocks.
`I entered by another route,' answered
Louis.
`How?'
`Through a hut.'
`Who has opened that entrance which has
been closed for years and unknown to but a
few living men?' he demanded.
Louis briefly explained what is already
known to the reader, and the smuggler
bidding
him return conducted him back, and so
out by the way he entered. The fallen door
and piece of bridle in the belt in the chimney
showed him that his guest had doubtless
spoken
truly.
As Louis mounted his horse, the smuggler
said in a low tone, `I know your father's blood
and it should be honorable. But I cannot trust
all men. I warn you. If this depot be
discovered
through your visit here to-night
yonder
chateau shall be levelled with the ground;
and there my vengeance shall not stop.
Beware
!'
`But the opening is plain enough seaward
methinks.'
`No. In the day time it appears a wild
chaos of hanging and piled up rocks giving
foot-hold only to the gull and against which
the surges below roll with ceaseless roar. No
vessels but ours can approach within half a
mile and boats seldom come near for the
breakers
.
The whole cliff-ribbed coast for leagues
has been searched for this secret spot and yet
it has been undiscovered except by those
whose lives'here his voice fell to a low and
menacing tone`have been the forfeit of their
dangerous knowledge.'
Pray let me know your name. Methinks it
should have reached my ears and I would
like to learn I am right.'
`Lan-frane.'
`Ha! The'
`Enough,' said the other quickly and
sternly
.
`You are a wonderful man. I am not
mortified
at my discomfiture now that I know
who has been my victor.'
The other smiled with grim pleasure at
the compliment his words conveyed and then
waved him an adieu and re-entered the hut.
It was now about two in the morning. The
clouds had broken away and as Louis turned
from the hut the moon suddenly shone out
and gave a brilliancy to the scene that
singularly
and beautifully contrasted with the late
storm. Reflecting upon the singular place
upon which he had found shelter and upon
the events that followed he put spurs to his
horse and rode up from the beach to regain
the top of the cliff. He soon reached the
summit
and drew rein to look abroad upon the
channel with the fate of the frigate and the
unhappy line-of-battle-ship in his thoughts.
Calais with its towers and battlements was on
the left, and the towers of the chateau were
visible to the right a third of a league distant,
while before him stretching from the west to
the east was the dark channel, its distant
waves leaping to the moonlight in silvery jets,
and those nearer rolling in shoreward with
that majestic roll which ever follows a storm.
Not a sail was visible in all the wide expanse
to cheer his eye, but portions of the channel
lay in shadow from clouds suspended above
them. Suddenly a moonbeam fell upon a
distant sail. Could it be the frigate? He
looked with intense earnestness, when what
seemed so far off, as the moon fell upon
it proved to be near, within a mile; and
distinctly
showed herself to be a raking schoon
er under a fore-topsail, jib and mainsail.
He again looked searchingly over the
channel
for any signs of the frigate, when he heard
a heavy gun fired from the direction of the
chateau, the sound of which at that hour fell
with startling distinctness upon his ears. He
looked in the direction of the chateau, when
he saw a flash upon the water opposite to it
and heard another report that awoke the
echoes of the cliff with prolonged
reverberations
.
By the glare of the flash he could
see about a third of a mile off against the
chateau
a huge hulk rolling landward upon the
waves which threatened it with destruction
upon the reefs towards which they were
bearing
it. He gazed an instant endeavoring to
make it out more distinctly and then
exclaiming
`La Minerve!' put spurs to his horse and
galloped at full speed towards that point of
the shore.
Heavily thundered gun after gun from the
wreck of the majestic battle-ship as each wave
heaved her shoreward Louis rode like the
wind. He beheld the corses of men strewed
upon the beach in great numbers; here a
boat stranded bottom upwards, and there a
burnt fragment of the burnt spars of the wreck.
The whole shore as he went along presented
to his eyes painful evidences of the terrible
destruction produced by the hurricane which
had so lately swept land and sea like a besom.
Ship wrecked men wandered along the beach
or sat upon the rocks till aid should come to
them. This he did not delay to offer, for he
saw it was at hand. The cessation of the
gale had led the alert authorities of the city
to despatch parties from town to search for
and bury the bodies of the drowned, and give
protection to those who had escaped. Soldiers
were also dispatched and were moving to the
scene of disaster, for the purpose of protecting
the dead from being stripped by the rabble,
and protecting property that might have
drifted
ashore. Of all the boats which had left
the burning ship, but onethe life-boat
reached
the shore. The rest were submerged with
all their crews, most of whom perished ere
they could gain the land. Out of five
hundred
men caught by the storm in the boats,
but seventy-one escaped in safety. The
life-boat
which, it will be remembered contained
the officers with Capt. Navarre, was several
times overturned, each time righting with
diminished
numbers. When at length she
reached the shore, which she was three hours
in doing, but eleven persons, five officers and
six men, remained in her. One of them was
Capt. Navarre. Fatigued and incapable of
farther exertion, they threw themselves on the
ground, sheltered by rocks, and there
remained
until the storm abated a little, when they
sought shelter in the chateau, the hospitable
doors of which were thrown wide open all
night, and lights burned in every window, to
guide the shipwrecked mariner to shelter. The
Marquis received them with gratitude to God
for their escape, which was not lessened when
he found that Captain Navarre was among
them, and who was an old school-boy friend.
The officers and men were shown to
comfortable
quarters, while the Marquis led Captain
Navarre to his own room, which overlooked
the water. Here the Captain informed him
with insolable grief, of the loss of his
daughter
.
The Marquis after hearing his narrative,
endeavored to console him with the hope of
her yet surviving, and being restored to his
arms.
`No, no! She has perished! The ship is
lost! My poor Madeline is lost to me forever,'
was the only reply of the inconsolable father.
The Marquis, at length, left him to send
succor
to any others that might have reached the
shore, while his thoughts were full of anxiety
for his son, whom he had not seen since his
departure for Calais. Josephine, also, was in
her chamber in tears, lest, so great had been
the violence of the storm on land, he had
perished
in it.
When at length the moon broke through the
clouds, Josephine went out upon the balcony
and after casting a hasty glance leeward, fixed
her gaze intently on the road to Calais, upon
which the light lay brightly for half a mile.
She turned her weary gaze away to rest her
eyes upon the channel, when they fell upon a
dark object that she knew was a dismasted ship.
A cry which she unconsciously uttered at the
unexpected sight, brought the Marquis and
Captain Navarre to the balcony, when the
practised
eyes of the latter instantly discovered the
floating wreck. He saw at once from its size
and condition that it must be Le Minerve,
which he had anticipated, if she could float so
long, that the change in the direction of the
gale would drive back again to that
neighborhood
.
If he had any doubls the report of a
thirty-two pounder, the flash of which lighted
up her sides and showed her serried tiers of
ports, fully removed them.
`It is the line-of-battle-ship,' he cried. `I
pray you hand me a spy-glass.'
Josephine placed one in his hand with which
he surveyed the wreck a few moments,
speaking
at intervals,
`Yesshe is there, the poor Minerve! The
storm must have extinguished the
conflagration
!
Oh, that it were day that I might know
if my daughter lives! But no! She must
have perishedfor the fire has swept away
every thing clean above decks. Ha! another
gun! Some one is on board! Could we have
left any of the men! There she fires again!
Whoever it is knows his danger! The ship is
driving towards the ledge that makes out below
the chateau! With this heavy ground swell
will break up like an egg shell! Let us to the
beach and render assistance! There is a sail
in the offing! A schooner standing in! She
can help any one on board if she can come along
side of her before she reches the breakers! She
surges in rapidly!let us not delay, but hasten
with all means of relief to the shore.
Painful indeed was the surprise with which
they watched from the rocky ledge towards
which the ship was surging her advance to
destruction
.
Even divested of her lofty masts
she was a stately and majestic spectacle to
their eyes. Josephine watched also from the
balcony on her knees in prayers for the lives
of whoever was on board.
`Alas,' said Captain Navarre, as he saw
with all a seaman's affection and grief his
noble
ship borne still noble in her ruins, swiftly
towards the spot where he stood impotent to
save or succor. She was now within two
cable's length rising and falling with a slow
and sublime progress that filled the spectators
with emotions of awe and fear. The
discharge
of cannon had ceased, for Henry
Monteith
had seen the party hurrying from the
chateau to the beach with ropes and boards.
`Come, Madeline, do not fear but we shall
now be saved,' he said, lifting her upon the
helms-man's house. `If they see you they
will make greater exertions for our safety.'
Madeline, supported by him stood upon the
elevation, so as to overlook the bulwarks and
see the group on the rocks.
`Oh, that my father were there, then should
I be perfectly happy,' she said.'
`My child! my child!' she heard from the
land in a loud voice, as Captain Navarre at the
same moment saw the fluttering of a white
robe upon the stern, and knew that his
daughter
must be there. A wild shriek of joy
replied
from the deck and the poor maiden
whom too much happiness had well nigh
killed
,
fell insensible. Monteith had hardly
raised her up when the huge fabric was lifted
unusually high by a vast billow which sinking
beneath it let the wreck fall upon a
half-sunken
ledge with terrible effect. A tremendous
shock convulsed her whole frame and parting
amidships the forward part rolled over with a
terrific noise, and plunging beneath the waves
with all the weight of its armament and
enormous
bulk, displaced a wide space in the
sea, which rolling back over the stern parting
in a towering column, poured upon it a flood
of great depth and irresistible power.
Monteith
,
ere he could plan escape, was
submerged
with Madeline fast held in his embrace and
was carried over the bulwarks far beyond the
wreck. His senses did not forsake him, and
he struggled to reach the surface. But he
had been carried down in a circle of the
vortex
made by the sinking bows, and he was
nearly exhausted when at length he reached
the top of a wave
but his burden had been torn
from him
he knew not how! He plunged
beneath the surface again and with a heart
sinking and with life no longer valuable
rere-rose
alone!
Some object was borne
against him by a wavewet tressses were
driven in his faceit was Madeline! But he
still felt they must perish together as he
clasped
her to his heart. A few yards before him
on the rocks, he saw her distracted father held
by the Marquis and others, least he should
plunge in to attempt to save them. Every
voice was encouragement, but every arm was
weak to save; Suddenly a horeseman dashed
down the precipicegalloped along the ledge
a plunge!and horse and rider were
battling
the wave.
`She is saved?' cried the Marquis, as Louis
took her lifeless form across his saddle! `God
save my brave son!'
`She is saved!' echoed Josephine as she
beheld this gallant act from the balcony, and
saw both Henry and the maiden landed in
safety upon the rock. But her heart beat not
so thankfully as it ought, for she had heard
that Madeline Navarre, whom she had now
seen rescued from a watery grave
by Louis
was `young and fair.'
CHAPTER V.
Nearly opposite the Chateau de Fernay, on
the English shore, there stood, at the time of
our story, a stately country house, which
commanded a wide prospect of the channel
with a glimpse of the coast of France, and
far to the cast of the towers and battlements
of Dover Castle. The morning of the day of
the terrific tempest whose power and effect
we have attempted to describe, and a few
hours before we introduced Louise de Vernay
to the reader in the balcony of his father's
chateau, anxiously watching for the
appearance
of the Minerve, whose loss we have
recorded
,
a gentleman stood in the south
window
of this villa, looking abroad upon the
channel. He was about forty-five years of
age, tall and dignified in his person and
carriage
,
and with the air of a high-bred
English
gentleman.
A fine schooner hove in sight, when she
fired a gun from a stern chaser, at some
object
out of sight behind the headland, which
was instantly returned by a heavy canonading
from an invisible source. The shot struck the
water around the schooner whitening the
surface
with paths of foam, and her
fore-top-gallant-mast
went over the side, carrying
top-gallant
sail and royal with it. The schooner
broached to, and for a moment lost her
steering
way, while around the point appeared the
flying jib and then the head sails of a large
English brig of war in full chase, and
keeping
up a constant firing at the schooner from
her bow guns. The gentleman saw at once
that it was a smuggler escaping from a King's
cruiser. He became intensely interested in
the exciting scene and looked with admiration
at the smuggler as recovering from the
momentary
effect of losing his fore-top-gallant
sail, he continued on his course, gallantly
returning
the fire of his pursuer.
`There was a good shot,' suddenly cried the
English gentleman, as a ball from the
schooner's
stern gun struck the heel of the brig's
bow-sprit and carried it away, leaving both
her jibs flying loose to the winds. The brig
instantly yawned, the helmsman lost all
command
of her, and before the braces could be
manned to bring the other sails to aid her
steering way, she fell off broadside to the
schooner.
`It is unfortunate! The fellow will now
escape,' said the gentleman. `Ah, the brig is
unmanageable, and there is the Backbone reef
within half a cable's length of her, and she is
driving right upon it! They've brought her
up! No; there goes another gun from the
smuggler, andoh God! the shot has
penetrated
her magazine!' suddenly cried the
gentleman
clasping his hands together, and nearly
falling to the floor.
With an explosion that was felt many miles
inland, the cruiser blew up, filling the air with
a dark volcano-like discharge of fragments of
the brig, fire, smoke and human bodies. High
and wide they ascended, and then falling on
every side into the water, all was still. The
surface of the water was covered with
innumerable
objects and the atmosphere
sulphurous
and murky with smoke. These were all
that met his eyes when he looked a second
time. Where a moment before he had seen a
stalely brig of war, now none was visible.
The schooner immediately run up at her
mast-head a green flag, and firing a gun,
instead
of putting out to sea to secure her
escape
so singularly favored, altered her course
suddenly, and stood in towards the shore.
The gentleman from the villa watched her at
first with surprise, and then with a look of
painful suspicion and alarm. As she came
nearer, his brow grew troubled, and, when at
length he could see the device on the flag, he
beat his forehead with a look of anguish and
a cry of execration, in the mutterings of which
the words, `brother' and `outlaw,' could be
heard. He watched the schooner, and saw
her come to, opposite the window, and a boat,
containing one person besides four oarsmen,
put off from her, and rapidly approached the
shore. The individual in the stern he seemed
to recognize, and was overcome at once by the
intensest alarm; not such as would arise from
fears of pillage, but the expression of his
face showed it to be one in which the
affections
were the movers. He fled from the
window and clasping his son to his heart, took
him in his arms and fled with him from the
room. He pursued his way through a hall
that terminated in a flight of steps, which he
reached and ascended with his still sleeping
burden. At the top of the stairs was a door,
which led into a small oratory, which he
entered
.
The interior wes a chapel, such as
formerly, and frequently still, were in use in
the mansions of the Catholic gentlemen of
England. It was filled with a rosy light from
a stained window above the altar, yet it was
dim and shadowy, from the heavy cornices
and drapery hanging around the sides. It was
silent as the tomb! The father threw
himself
upon his knees before the altar, and
offered
up a short prayer for the safety of his son
the heir of his name and househis only born
and beloved child! The boy still slept on his
father's bosom. Not the earthquake like
explosion
of the cruiser, the cry of anguish of
his father on seeing the device upon the
smugler's
flag, nor the burried motion of his
strange and sudden flight with him in his arms,
had wakened him from the deep sleep into
which invalids so often fall; as if the senses
in extreme debility were less alive to external
infirmities.
The father then rose from his knees and
laid the sleeping boy upon a velvet cassock
beside it, kissed his cheek, and stood up to
listen. The door of the oratory by which he
had entered, he had closed and barred. He
was in a corner tower of the building, and was
in the securest part of the massive pile.
Therefore, he had fled hither for refuge. But
wherefore? Had he not numerous retainers
of his household within call? Why then,
should be fly thus timidly from the occupants
of a small boat?
The history of a few years prior to this
period
will explain. Sir Walter Horsley was
the father of the gentleman now introduced
to the reader, the grandfather of the boy
Walter, for whom he has exhibited such
extraordinary
solicitude. Old Sir Walter was
descended from a Roman Catholic general,
who distinguished himself in the service of
the `Bloody Mary,' and from whom he
received
knighthood, and the gift of a fine
domain
.
His descendant, Sir Walter, married
the daughter of an Irish baronet, who
presented
him with twin boys, and in giving them
life, gave up her own. The boys grew up
together
,
and were greatly attached the one to
the other, and a delightful affection marked
all their intercourse. Sir Walter was proud
of them, and resolved to set aside the law of
primogeniturefor Ralph was a few minutes
older than Edwardand divided his estate
between
them. In disposition, these twins
were very dissimilar. Edward was docile,
gentle, and had a kindly feeling towards
every
thing that had life. Ralph was bold,
combative
,
and at times, vindictive. At the age
of twelve they were seat to Eton, where one
won all hearts by his amiable and noble points
of character, and the other made himself
unpopular
by his overbearing pride and
impatience
of spirit. The same effects followed
them through Oxford, Edward leaving the
halls with friendship of all who had known
him, Ralph only remembered for his
haughtiness
and viciousness of character, love for
pleasure, and a reckless career of expensive
dissipation. Yet in their intercourse with
each other, these two young men were all
affection
and love, and neither knew a fault in
the other. Edward, had been a hundred times
Ralph's champion, both with blows and words
of eloquence, though Ralph had few
occasions
to show his own ready spirit to act in
defence of his brother's name or fame.
At length at the age of twenty-three, they
returned to Horseley Hall to enter upon life.
Sir Walter was not long in discovering and
appreciating the differences of character in
his two sons. He loved them both, but
Edward
shared the profoundest place in his
affection
.
He admired the bold character and
lofty independent spirit which Ralph
exhibited
,
but he
loved
the gentler qualities of his
brother. The two young men had been at
home nearly a year, Edward passing his time
principally in the library among the treasures
of science and philosophy, occasionally
visiting
London to select rare and new books, and
for the purpose of enjoying the society of the
learned and eminent men of the kingdom.
Ralph on the other hand, devoted himself to
the sports of the field and the society of men
of pleasure. He was also attached from
boy-hood
to the water, and had always been
remarkable
for his venturesome spirit as a
boatman
;
having at the age of seventeen crossed
the channel alone, in a small sail boat which
his father had given him. He now divided
his time between his horses and hounds, and
a beautiful yacht, of a hundred and twenty
tons, which rode at anchor beneath the cliff,
when he was not coasting in her. He called
her `The
Steel Arrow
;' an arrow of steel
being the crest of the Horsley coat of arms.
This device he also displayed upon a flag,
with a green ground, at her peak.
Thus Ralph Horsley gave himself up to
pleasure and dissipation, spending far more
than his allowed income. At length his
expenses
became so great from heavy losses on
the turf and at the faro table, that he was
forced to mortgage his yacht and horses to
raise money to meet them. When extracted
from these embarrassments he speedily fell into
others, when fearing to draw on his farther
and brother's liberality, both of whom had from
time to time advanced him money, he forged
his father's acceptance and also afterwards
that of Edward s to large amounts. For some
time his crime was undiscovered, and he
hoped
to keep it so by winning enough at betting
to take up the bills before they should be
presented
to his fatherthe delusive hope of all
who are tempted to commit this crime. But
fortune did not favor him and the acceptances
were presented to Sir Walter and Edward and
pronounced
forgeries
. They however did not
expose the crime of the brother and son to
the Bank but paid them in silence, assuming
the signature, thus hoping to shield from
ignominy
their proud family name, and by this
indulgence win Ralph to virtue and honor.
He expressed his gratitude for this
clemency
when his surprise on hearing of it had
subsided
and promised them both they should
never hear again of his departure from
integrity
.
Ralph Horsley, however, was too
fondly
wedded to his pleasures and vices to be
broken from them by a mere passing promise
based on no reformation of the heart of
principle
.
Rejoiced at his escape from exposure
(though he had from the first secretly
believed
his father and Edward would not expose
him) he now plunged more deeply into his
dissipations. Soon the same difficulties he
had resorted to forging, to escape from,
became
his lot again, and as he found writing
his father's and brother's name a very easy
and brief affair,a mere scratch of the pen
he did not hesitate to forge them a second
time, as might have been foreseen. They were
at short date and he was unable to meet them
and was forced to let them be presented to
those whose name he had forged. The sums
were very large and Sir Walter after his
surprise
,
grief and indignation would let him
speak, unable to pay them, openly
pronounced
them `forgeries.' Edward did all in his
power-offered
to his father to make every
sacrifice to save the exposure of his brother,
but all in vain. He was forced to confess the
draft on himself a forgery or screen his
brother
by a falsehood. The bank officer after his
astonishment was over, said he disliked to
prosecute and would take Sir Walter and
Edward's
first acceptance at a long date instead
of the money and keep the affair a secret. To
this, at Edward's earnest entreaty, Sir Walter
consented; the bills were jointly given and
the banker returned to them the forged name
which bore testimony to the crime that had
been committed. Edward consigned the
papers
instantly to the flames, and, with a heavy
heart mourned over his brother's direliction
from the paths of honor, he sought his library
in his books to forget his sorrow and disgrace.
Sir Walter, however, in whose breast anger,
shame, and grief were mingled for his guilty
son, returned to his chamber and sending
for his legal adviser made his will, devising
all his estate, real and person, to `his well
beloved
son Edward,' and cutting off Ralph with
a shilling.
Ralph kept himself secreted until he knew
that his father had settled with the banker and
that he had nothing to fear, and then made his
appearance at home with great show of
penitence
and contritione-well-acted remorse.
This produced no effect upon Sir Walter, who
treated him with cold civility only; but it
touched Edward's more sensitive nature and
he forgave him all his errors so far as they
affected
himself, restored him to his confidence
and affection and loaned him one thousand
pounds `to prevent the necessity of resorting
to dishonest means of replenishing his purse.'
At length Sir Walter Horsley grew sick
unto death, for the conduct of his son daily
preyed upon his heart and dried up the springs
of life. He died and was placed in the tombs
of his fathers beneath the chancel in the
little
chapel of the tower. Ralph was present
at the ceremony of interment and retired with
Edward and the witnesses and others allied to
the family to hear the will read; all present
(including the twins themselves) except those
who drew it up and witnessed it, believed that
it was only the decision, in writing, of Sir
Walter's well known and repeatedly
expressed
intention to divide Horsley manor equally
between his two sons, though Ralph was the
elder twin.
Ralph's indignant surprisehis fierce wrath
may easily be conceived when the brief will
was read by the solicitor and the full intention
of the deceased testator known. For a few
moments he was silent with rage, shame and
disappointment. He then strode up to the
lawyer, and snatching the will from his hands
keenly examined his father's signature which
he had given such proof of being familiar
with. It was Sir Walter's writing. He then
cast the will in the face of the solicitor and
strode fiercely towards Edward.
`Sir, this is your doings!' he said in a loud
menacing tone, `
you
set him up to this. Sir
Walter never would have disniherited
me
for
such a womanly spirited, book worm as you
are. I despise you! I hate you! I have
only pretended to love you that I might use
you. So,
Sir
, Edward Horsley; you shall
rue this day, nor long enjoy honors so basely
won.'
`Brother,' said Edward calmly, after
desiring
the rest to quit the room, `I am as
greatly
surprised as you are, at this reading of the
will. I have done you no wrong, I wish you
no wrong. You may have the estateif you
give me but my books. The title I would give
you also if I could divest myself of it, but as
it descends by a peculiar law with the estate,
I must wear it.'
`You add insult to wrong, sir! you would
make me the offer of being your tenant at
will; a sort of overscer of your estates, while
you enjoy all the dignities and honors! No,
sir! you have by art and duplicity won from
me my heritage. Keep it.'
`This quarrel is deeply painful to me
brother
.
Can nothing move you to make peace?'
Ralph remained standing a few moments in
deep thought and then said
`There is no help for it. It is done. I
must have money in some way! know you
that I am secretly married to an Earl's
daughter
!
I have a daughter three years old. We
must live and cannot do it without money.
Mortgage your estates and raise for me fifty
thousand pounds, and I will let you enjoy
your ill-got patrimony.'
`It shall be done tomorrow, brother, if the
money can be raised,' answered Edward
promptly, and offering his hand, which Ralph
took coldly and then walked moodily away
from him, to gaze upon his mortgaged yacht,
which lay anchored beneath the window.
In a few days the mortgage was effected,
and the fifty thousand pounds paid by
Edward
over to his brother; who then took leave
of him saying that he was going to reside on
the continent until the death of his wife's
father
,
when fortune would again smile on him.'
`Never, brother, while honor and virtue
frown upon you, `answered Edward kindly,
but with dignity. `Farewell, and may heaven
bless you, and restore you to honor and
usefulness
.'
Ralph took no notice of his brother's words,
save by suffering a proud expression of scorn
to settle upon his lip, as he parted from him to
meet him no more for years. Sir Edward's
grief at his departurefor with all his errors,
he was deeply attached to himwas
considerably
modified, by receiving soon after a line
from a banker, notifying him that his
acceptance
for five thousand pounds, in favor of his
brother Ralph Horsely, was shortly due;
accompanying
which note, was another,
addressed
to him as the representative of Sir
Walter Horsely, notifying him of the near
maturity of a bill, endorsed by Sir Walter, in
favor of his son Ralph, for the sum of nine
thousand pounds.
Sir Edward paid these bills by making great
sacrifices, knowing they would be the last
from this source. About two years afterwards,
he married the daughter of a neighboring
baronet, who the following year, presented
him with a fine son, whom he named Walter,
after his father. By the time Walter had
reached his eighth year, his father had cleared
the estate he looked forward for him to inherit,
from the heavy incombrance of Ralph's forged
bills, and of the mortgage of fifty thousand
pounds in his behalf. During all this time, he
had no certain word of his brother, though
rumors
reached him of a nature, which led him
to fear he had added to the crime of forgery,
wickedness of a deeper and grosser character.
Young Walter at length reached his
thirteenth
year, when his father was satisfied that
deeply laid plans were in operation from some
unseen source, to deprive him of his son.
Once he had been carried off by a Gipsey man
and woman, and rescued in time. Once he
had been decoyed from his attendant and
would have been taken off in a boat, but for
his loud cries, and the appearance of the
latter with aid, his shouts fortunately bronght
to the spot. A third time his sleeping
apartment
had been invaded and his bed, from which
he had that night chanced to sleep, turned
down and examined by a man, whom his
attendant
distinctly saw from his own couch,
but was too greatly terrified to move or to
speak until he moved away muttering words
of disappointment. Other incidents occurred
which led the parent to see that if he would
not be childless, he must watch over his
child's safety every moment. His mother,
Lady Horseley, at length become so anxious
and nervous, that her health suffered, and
after
lingering a long time in consumption, she
died. Sir Edward's whole soul was now
absorbed
in his child, and he gave himself up to
his protection. Young Walter, himself, from
being a bold, fearless and spirited lad, caught
the infection of fear, and grew nervous and
timid, and his father saw with anguish, that
his health was suffering.
He reached his fourteenth year, and for
several
months there having been no further
occurrence
of an alarming nature, the vigilance
with which he was watched over, had
somewhat
abated, and he was permitted to walk
upon the beach in front of the dwelling, with
two attendants well armed. One morning a
fishing boat, which they had been watching,
dancing over the waves came near to the land
where they were standing. In the boat was
an old woman and a boy. The woman got
out and approached them with a basket on
her arm. One of the attendants asked her if
she had fresh fish, when she came up to them
and opened her basket. It contained a large
bouquet of flowers.
`I am not a fish woman, but a flower
woman
from the opposite coast,' she answered
with a foreign accent. `I bring my French
flowers to Dover. You have none like them
in England. Will my lord purchase?' she
asked, glancing towards the Hall, and then
fixing a keen and peculiar gaze upon the boy's
face.
`I will buy, woman,' said Walter,
admirthe
flowers. `My father doesn't care for
flowers
,
and I love them.'
`Are you my lord's son?' she asked in a
careless tone, evidently assumed, to conceal
the sudden joy that sparkled in her dark
eyes.
`Yes, if you call Sir Edward Horsely `my
lord,' said Walter, smiling. `What do you
ask for this fine, large bouquet?'
`It is twelve francs.'
`I think it dear; but I will purchase it,'
said Walter. `But what is that beautiful
plant in the little vase with the scarlet flower?'
`That I have brought to make a present of
to whoever bought my bouquet. It is your's.
If you smell the flower every morning with
the dew upon it, it will restore health to the
invalid and impart its own hues to the cheek.'
`Then it is more valuable than all. You
shall be paid for it.'
`No. I sell you the bouquet and give you
this. It is a simple flower and of little value.
I see your cheek is pale and I hope it will
restore
you to health.'
Thus speaking the woman took her leave,
saying to herself, `I have done mine errand
quickly, for fortune has most kindly favored
me. This flower will insure success.' She
got into her boat, the boy set the sail, and
steered along the land towards Dover; but
when the boat had got out of sight behind the
headland, she took her way across the rippled
waters of the channel in the direction of the
French coast.
Walter placed the flower in his window,
and each morning inhaled its pleasant
fragrance
.
Instead of returning health, he grew
each day more and more ill, while his face
became
scarlet with a hot fever. Sir Edward at
length was informed about the flower, which
Walter had kept from him, hoping soon to
surprise him with full and vigorous health.
He instantly sent for it and knew at once that
his child had been poisoned. It was the utoe
lilya plant of the most subtle poison, found,
though rarely, in Auvergne. To inhale its
odor is noxious to human life, and if repeated,
often destroy it.
The poison had taken possession of the
youthful victim's system. Delirium followed
the earlier symptoms, and for several weeks
Walter's life hung upon a thread. Medical
skill and the careful nursing of his father,
subdued the disease, and he became slowly
convalescent. But it was found that the
poison
had affected his joints and limbs, and
that he was unable to walk when he got
up. His legs were distorted from their
symmetry and drew up, and his shoulders
grew deformed. He had become a cripple,
purchasing life at the expense of deformity.
Slowly, however, did his health improve, and
it was plain that he would never again be well
though he might live for years. With what
tendernesswhat intense affection and
benevolent
sympathy did Sir Edward watch by
his son day and night. He never left him.
His place was forever by his side, and in his
was his own life wrapped up.
Such was the state of affairs up to the
morning that we have introduced Sir Edward
Horsley to the reader, gazing from his library
window upon the waters of the channel, and
subsequently flying on the approach of a boat,
with a strange alarm for shelter to the oratory,
bearing his son in his arms.
He now looked around the chapel with an
anxious and bitter glance. In his hand he
held his side sword which he never went
without
.
His whole attitude was that of fear,
expectation
and desperate resolution.
`No, if it be hehe can never enter here.
I have made this holy place a sanctuary, and
if the fear of sacrilege will not keep him out,
bolts and bars will. Could it have been my
brother. I thought I recognized his form
even after seventeen years absence. He alone
would carry the device of the Steel Arrow.'
I have learned too surely that he has taken to
the seas against the revenue, and is now a
lawless chief of desperate smugglers, himself
the wickedest of them all. I have feared this
visit, I have been expecting him daily since
he left me, and now he is come. I could not
mistake that tall form which I used once to
admire and take pride in as he was my twin
brother. Alas, for the days when we loved
each otherwhen he was dear to me as my
own soul. But now he has only my pity, and
inspires me with horror. Crime has made a
wide gulf between us, as it will do in the next
world between the evil and the good. My
suspicions have long told me that he is the
author of my child's attempted abduction
and assassination. Horror that a brother
should seek the life of a brother's child.
Does he hope by his death to become inheritor
of these estates? then my death must also
follow. Oh, God, can a brother lift his hand
against a twin brother!'
`Wert thou seven times my brother,
Edward
Horsley, I would lift my hand against
thee if you stood between me and my desires,'
said a deep, vindictive voice near him.
Sir Edward startled at the sound of the
well known and terrible voice, and with a cry
of wild alarm caught up his son in his arms
and stood with his drawn sword upon his
defence
.
There was a desperate determination
in his eyes and attitude. Ralph Horsley, who
was now a tall, stout, dark complexioned man,
in seaman's dress, armed with pistols and a
short sword, gazed upon his brother a few
moments as if observing the change in his
apperance, and then said in a careless,
half-laughing
,
though coarse tone,
`Well, brother, you have something
changed
in sixteen years;
and so have I!
You
have always stood in my way, and this
moment
hold my titles and estates. I have come
for both of them.'
`Monster! you take them both with my
life,' cried Sir Edward, shuddering, yet
wanting
nothing in the courage and firmness the
moment called for.
`Thy life I want not now. If that brat be
removed, whom I take to be thy son, I am
content. I have a daughter I would marry
and have a fancy to give her Horsley Hall as
her portion.'
`This boy is the true heir before Heaven,
and no earthly power shall make me resign
his sacred right.'
`Thy boy stands in my way.'
`He is my son, and the true heir of
Horsley
.
Harm him not, brother! You have
sought his life thrice! Oh, think not of
pursuing
that life farther, which has been
miraculously
spared.'
`He shall die. If Heaven will save him
let her make another miracle in his behalf.'
`Demon! brother! stand off!' cried Sir
Edward, as his brother approached him
menacingly
,
to seize the poor boy who had
awaked
to all the terrors of his situation.
The muscular strength of the smuggler
was too great for that of Sir Edward, who
with natural repugnance at taking his
brother's
life, let him draw near till within his
sword guard, which he beat to the ground and
then wrested the boy from his grasp.
`Spare, oh! spare his life, and I will
surrender
to you alltitles, estates and all!
Nay, I will enter a monastery for life. You
shall never hear of me more. Spare, oh
spare, brother!' he cried in agony and
anguish
,
as Ralph, after suspending the boy
over the low altar a moment, laid him upon
it, and held his short sword to his breast.
Walter had fainted and lay insensible like a
lamb waiting the sacrifice.
`He shall die!' answered the smuggler,
fiercely. `I will have my rights back again.
I have tried secretly to get his life without
success long enough; I will now ensure it.
He dies!'
`Then God forgive me! die
thyself
' cried
Sir Edward, striking his glittering sword at
his heart. The blade encountered a mailed
shirt, and bending, broke to the hilt it his
grasp. With a loud laugh the outlaw brought
the point of the sword close to the boy's heart.
`Save his life and take
mine!
oh spare him,
brother; Let him live and I will die!' cried
the agonized father. `Remember the place!
It is holy!'
`So much the better.'
`It is an altar of God upon which you have
lain him.'
`So much the better for a sacrifice.
He
dies!
'
The sword of the assassin was raised above
his head high in the airSir Edward sprung
at the same instant upon the altar, and
covering
his son's heart with his own, the sword of
the fratricide penetrated the living bodies
both of father and son at one blow!
CHAPTER VI.
We have seen the beautiful and heroic
Madeline
Navarre rescued from the waves, after
the loss of the line-of-battle ship, by Louis de
Fernay. We have also seen the effect of
transient jealousy it produced upon his fair
cousin, the Countess Josephine, who
witnessed
his gallant conduct from a window of the
chateau; for she had heard that the rescued
maiden was `young and fair.'
With joy that expressed itself in tears, the
grateful Captain Navarre clasped his
recovered
child to his heart, and overwhelmed Louis
with thanks for preserving her life. Henry
Monteith also grasped Louis' hand, and
gratefully
thanked him for his assistance, instead
of showing that reserve, which lovers often
do, fowards another young man who aids them
in rescuing their lady love in a time of peril.
Madeline was borne insensible to the chateau,
her almost lifeless form attended by her father,
who forgot not to take Monteith's hand, and
ask his forgiveness for his severity towards
him.
`Young man,' he said to him as they
climbed
the rocks to the mansion, `you have been
instrumental in preserving to me my only
daughter; if she recovers, and does not say
`nay, she shall be yours, as none can be more
worthy of her.' Henry returned the grasp of
his hand with feelings of pride and happiness,
and fervently prayed that the lovely girl they
were bearing to the chateau might live to bless
him. Louis, in the meanwhile, remained to
watch the motions of the schooner, which he
had discovered in the offing, and which was
now lying too, nearly abreast the smuggler's
cave. He thought he saw a boat putting off
from her and pulling in towards the land, and
after watching a few seconds, the gleam of
moonshine upon a range of lifting and falling
oars, convinced him that he was not mistaken.
Springing into his saddle, he spurred his trusty
horse, still reeking with sea-water, towards
the cavern. He felt a deep interest in the
man he saw there, Lan-franc, whom he knew
to be a leader of a daring horde that had for
years infested the French coast. He also
desired
to know who sailed in the rakish
schooner
that lay rocking upon the undulating sea
like a snowy gull riding upon the waves.
Leaving him on his way to the vicinity of the
cavern, where he expected the boat to land,
we will return to the chateau.
Madeline has been borne to the chamber of
the Countess Josephinemedical aid had
arrived
from Calaisand every means that
affection
and skill could command, was
employed
to affect her restoration. But the pulse of
life, which had grown fainter each hour, at
length ceased its scarcely perceptible
vibrations
,
and the lovely Madeline Navarre lay,
in the presence of weeping friends and silent
spectators, a corpse, lovely even in the marble
of death!
Her father gazed upon her awhile in
speechless
grief, kissed her cold forehead and
senseless
lips, and left the chamber to indulge his
sorrow alone. Henry Monteith was left alone
with her! He knelt beside her inanimate
form, and, with her hand clasped in his, he
bent his forehead upon them thus grasped, and
wept like a child. At length he became calm
and realized the vastness of his misfortune!
He paced the chamber long in agony and grief,
at times approaching he, body and addressing
her in the language of eloquent despair; at
others, kneeling beside her, seemingly as
inanimate
with his grief as she for whom he
mourned. The morning sun darted its earliest
beams into the chamber of death, and rested
like a blessing upon the face of the corpse. It
came through rosy stained glass, and gave to
the marble hue of the countenance the flush
and semblance of life.
`My child! she lives,' cried Capt. Navarre,
entering at this moment and seeing this effect
of the sunlight.
He rushed towards her to clasp death in his
arms, and feel the chill of death strike to his
soul from the icy lips he warmly pressed.
Monteith was deeply affected by this scene.
His heart bled for the father, and approaching
him he spoke.
`Even in death she lives,' he said gazing
upon her.
`My sonmy sonforgive me!' he said
turning and opening his arms.
Monteith rushed into them, and the late
foes remained long and wept in each others
embrace beside that unconscious corpse of
reconciliation
.
Louis de Fernay followed the course of the
shore until he came near the tavern where he
had met the adventure of the night before,
when, dismounting from his horse, he
fastened
him to a projection of the crag, and
cautiously
descended to the beach. He saw
through the trees, glimpses of a boat
approaching
with four oars, and containing two
persons
.
He watched it till he saw it enter and
disappear in the wild mouth of the cavern.
He then made his way to the hut and entered
with secreey. It was, as before, silent and
without an occupant. The door, which had
been thrown down in the storm, had been
replaced
by Lan-franc, but on trial he found
that it was not secured. He removed it with
out noise and entered the passage. He
proceeded
to its extremity, when he heard voices
of persons approaching from the sea outlet,
and the steps of another coming from the
interior
of the cave. He hastily drew back
within
one of the recesses, when Lan franc pushed
rapidly along, with a lantern in one hand and
a pistol in the other, in the direction of the
approaching voices. He heard his greeting,
and then all came towards the spot in which
he stood, on the way to the inner chamber of
the vault.
By the side of Lan-franc, who carried the
lantern, the light of which he turned upon
his face as he conversed with him, walked a
tall, dark man, with a face expressive of the
fiercest passions. It was Ralph Horsely. His
brow was gloomy and stern, and his tones
were impatient and angry, as if something had
displeased him. Behind him followed a lad
in seaman's jacket, and blue cap; a graceful,
handsome boy, with a fearless, a beautiful firm
lip, almost girlish for its delicacy. He
reresembled
the taller stranger sufficiently to
have been his child. Lan-franc led them to
the inner apartment of the cavern, and Louis,
prompted by curiosity, followed unseen.
`This will not excuse you, `sir,' said
Horseley
,
sternly; `I bade you have all the
merchandise
disposed ofthe money ready for my
hand on my return! Yet I find it all here in
store, and of no more value to me now than so
much of the bare rock. I want the money!'
`I could not prevent the storm, Captain.
If the vessels which were to take it have been
driven back, I am not to blame. The goods
should have been sent to Calais yesterday but
for what I told you. There is time enough
tomorrow night.'
`Tomorrow night! By the red cross of
Lucifer
it you prate to me longer I will throttle
you, villain,' said Horsely, fiercely. `I have
no time to wait! I must be on board and at
sea by day-break. I can run no risk by
staying
here to wait for money. I have blown up
a King's cruiser, and done other deeds in the
last twenty-four hours that will make these
waters too hot for `The Steel Arrow's keel a
day longer. What money have you,
Lan-franc
?'
`None.'
`It is false.'
`I like not your mood,' said Lan-franc,
haughtily. `If you are Captain one side of
the channel I am chief on this side. I am as
well born as thyself. I am not to be dictated
to! Choose better words in your speech if
you would hold further discourse with me.'
`I am in no humor to select my words, so
you must take as I give them;' said Horseley,
between surprise and vindictiveness. `Come,
I must have money. I am going to sail for
America, and give my services to the rebels.
I must have gold, and
you have it!
'
`I have none.'
`You are a liar.'
`Ha! take that!' exclaimed Lan-franc,
striking him violently in the face.
`And take
that
, villain,' cried Horsely,
instantaneously
drawing a pistol and
discharging
at his head. The Frenchman fell dead
without a struggle. Horsely, with a smile of
triumphant vindictiveness, returned his
smoking
pistol to his belt and beckoned to the lad,
who had sprung forward, when Lan-franc
gave the blow with a drawn stiletto, as if to
avenge it.
`Frank.'
`Sir.'
`This is an ugly affair. Lan-franc was
useful
to me. But I forget I should no longer
need his services, as I must fly for blowing up
the cruiser.'
`It is a pity he struck you, father,' said the
lad; he has not paid too high for the blow
even with his life. Here is that American
prisoner aslaep or dead, or the pistol should
have waked him.'
`Wake him with a smart blow upon the
cheek.'
The Yankee `man of all work,' and late
one of the crew of `Capting Jemmy Coffin's
'morphrodite brig, the `Fishhook,' started to
his feet on receiving the rough salutation of
the handsome lad. He immediately
recognised
them, but was horror struck at
beholding
the dead body of Lan-franc. He instantly
fell upon his knees and begged for mercy.
`Cease, and tell me where Lan-franc keeps
his gold,' said Horsely. `I am going to sail
forthwith for America, and if you find it, I
will take you on board to your own country.'
This was a temptation to Zebedee Beebee,
and as he had already discovered Lan-franc's
secret treasure deposit, he promptly conducted
Horsely to the place. There were about twelve
hundred francs in gold and silver which he
took possession of, and then, after bidding
Zebedee search the body, he departed from the
cavern.
Louis witnessed all this with varied
emotions
of horror, surprise and resentment. He
took a dislike to Horsely on first beholding
his visage, and now that he had done a deed
of murder, he shuddered in his presence. The
youth, on the other hand, had deeply
interested
him, inasmuch as his great beauty, and
peculiar
grace of manner, and richness of voice,
led him to suspect his sex. He, therefore, let
them pass him, and unseen followed them as
far as the place of embarkation, at the
sea-outlet
of the cavern. Here the boat lay in a
little inlet above which projected the ragged
roof of the cave. Four oarsmen were waiting
in it for the appearance of their chief. On
seeing him approach two of them got out and
stood to receive them. Louis saw by the light
of the lantern, borne by Zebedee, that they
were armed with pistols and cutlasses. The
money was placed in the boat by the men,
and Horsely was about to step in, when Louis'
foot unluckily loosened a stone, the noise of
which attracted the quick ear of the smuggler.
Turning round and seizing the lantern from
the hand of the American, he rushed back
into
the shadow of the cavern, and before Louis
could escape his observation he was
discovered
.
`A spy! seize him!' cried Horsely to his
men.
In an instannt, ere he could prepare to
defend
himself, Louis was arrested and made
prisoner. His sword was taken from him and
he was hurried into the boat.
`Pull to the schooner,' said the smuggler
sternly. `We will then see what business this
gentleman has with us.'
It was just at the dawning of day that the
boat reached the schooner. Louis was taken
on board and conducted by Horsely's
command
into the cabin under guard. The
schooner
then filled away and stood westward, as
the rising sun gilded her sails and flashed from
the steel arrow at her truck.
Her course, as she passed a mile distant off
against the chateau, was witnessed by all its
inmates; for she had been recognized by her
`arrowy vane,' with the glass, to be the `Steel
Arrow,' so well known on the coast yet so
seldom seen.
The third day after these events, the
remains
of the ill-fated Madcline Navarre were
consigned to a tomb beneath the Chapel de
Fernay; and a few days afterwards, the
bereaved
father and happy lover departedthe
former to Calais, to join his late consort, the
frigate, which had run before the gale, and
afterwards with loss of her topmasts, put into
this port, previous to fitting out to join the fleet
of D'Estaing at New York.
Henry Monteith rejoined his ship at
Portsmouth
,
and also joined the squadron of Lord
Howe on the American coast. It was, perhaps,
a singular coincidence, that Captain Navarre
sailed in the frigate (of which he took
command
)
from Calais on the same day that
Henry
Monteith sailed from Portsmouth, in the
British frigate `The Thunderer,' of which he
was second lieutenant. The remaining scenes
of our story will be laid in New York Bay and
Long Island Sound, whither we beg our
readers
will have the courtesy to transfer their
imaginations.
CHAPTER VII.
When the French fleet under Admiral
D'Estaing arrived off New York to the
assistance
of the Americans, the British fleet under
Lord Howe was at anchor in New York Bay.
The appearance of D'Estaing was sudden, and
produced no little consternation in the
English
squadron. The wind, however, for
several
days was too unfavorable for D'Estaing to
enter the harbor and attack them, and
spending
the time in taking soundings, he waited
for an opportunity to sail in with his heavy
force, which must have gained a complete
victory over the British and made him master
of New York. At length the eleventh day
after his arrival off the Hook, D'Estaing
weighed anchor and put his fleet in motion.
The wind and tide `says Marshall in his Life
of Washington, `were peculiarly fovorable to
the passage of the bar, which it was supposed
he intended to attempt. It was to the British
Admiral and General a moment of awful
expectation
.
The attempt, if successful, must
have been attended with the loss of both their
fleet and army; if unfortunate, a brilliant
victory, and the destruction of the assailants,
might be contemplated as its most certain
consequences.'
The fleet stood in towards the channel, a
fine frigate taking the lead, when all at once
the frigate was seen to strike and remain fast
heeling over to leeward. The remainder of
the advancing vessels immediately put about
and going into the offing lay too and sent boats
to the assistance of the frigate. But two
British sloops of war seeing her situation had
already stood down towards her to which she
surrendered, and the boats returned to the
fleet, which stood eastward. At the next flood
the frigate was got off and piloted up the
harbor
and anchored off the castle or battery
point a noble prize, and one of which they
were not a little proud.
We will now return to `The Steel Arrow'
and her prisoner, Louis de Fernay. He had
remained an hour under guard in one of the
state rooms of the schooner, reflecting upon
his folly in suffering his curiosity and an
undefinable
interest in the handsome smuggler's
lad, to lead him to sacrifice his personal
liberty
,
if not peril his life. He knew from the
motions of the schooner, that she was rapidly
moving through the water, and that a few
hours would bear him far from the French
Coast, and the shores of Europe. He felt that
he was destined to be conveyed a prisoner to
the Americans unless the schooner should fall
into the hands of cruisers.
`You seem moody, sir,' said Horsely
suddenly
speaking, having sometime since
silently
entered the cabin.
`I am a prisoner, which methinks affords
slight room for looking pleased,' answered
Louis.
`You were a spy. Who are you?'
`Louis de Farnay.'
`The son of the Marquis?'
`The same.'
`Then this accounts for your being in the
neighborhood of the cave. But how did you
discover it?'
Louis informed him of the particulars of his
first entrance into the hut, already known to
the reader, and to which Horsely listened with
surprise and interest. `And so your
reappearance
there this morning was only from
curiosity?'
`Yes.'
`It is doubtless so. You are in the French
marine. I am short of hands and want on
officer
.
I believe your words and will give you
your liberty till we reach New York if you
will act as second officer on the passage.'
`I prefer returning to France. Land me
at the nearest port and I will pay you five
hundred francs.'
`It is a great temptationbut it is worth my
head to venture back. You must go on with
me. It is your own choice to go in irons or
as my second officer,'
`I go in irons then,' answered Louis
haughtily
.
`You shall have your choice,' said Horsely,
savagely; `Ho, there! bring irons and place
this prisoner in the ward room.'
The passage across the Atlantic had been
half made when one night in a terrific storm,
the first officer was washed overboard with two
of the watch. Horsely come below and
removing
the irons from Louis' limbs, told him
that his aid as a seaman and as a man were
required on the deck.
`So that I do not do service as your officer
I will willingly help,' he replied, and
followed
him to the deck. Here all was
confusion
and dismay; and the winds and waves,
the roar of the thunder and the darting of the
forked lightning were terrific. The schooner
had sprung the heel of her mainmast and was
laboring heavily,He applied all his skill and
energies to the duties he saw the imminent
danger called for, and his coolness and
knowledge
at once restored the confidence of the
men. The storm terminated at sunrise and
Horseley coming to Louis offered his hand
and told him he believed he was indebted to
him for the safety of his vessel. `From this
moment you are free. If you see fit to do duty
as first officer in any emergency, the post is
vacant.'
`I shall cheerfully do all in my power for
the safety of the schooner while I am on board.
as well as for the preservation of the lives of
those who sail in her,' answered Louis,
quietly
.
And from that day he was regularly on
deck, taking command of the starboard watch.
During the time he had been a prisoner the
young lad, who seemed to be a clerk and
private
attendant of Horseley, frequently showed
his sympathy for him by sending him books,
delicacies from the table and getting for him
the occasional privilege of walking on deck
to breathe the air. In him Louis became
deeply interested, and felt grateful for his
attentions
.
But he was never visited by him in
the ward-room nor addressed by him when on
deck in his chains; but the youth observed a
singular diffidence in his presence and showed
a desire to be unnoticed. Louis could not
discover
that he did any duty on board except
what was voluntary; that he never went
forward
;
and that his favorite place was at the
helm.
The third day after the storm Horseley was
in his birth, it being his watch below. Louis
was pacing the quarter-deck of the schooner
which was running under easy sail N N. W.
The youth was at the helm when Louis came
on deck and still retained it, sending the
relief
forward. Our hero stopped by the young
steersman and addressed him for the first time
in his life. The face of the youth was
instantly
overspread with a blushhis eyes
drooped before his gaze and his chest heaved,
while such was his confusion, that he forgot
his duty and let the vessel come up to the
wind till her sails shivered. Louis caught the
helm, smiled at his embarrassment and
putting
the vessel on her course again, was about
to resign it to him when he abruptly left the
deck and descended into the cabin, leaving
Louis fully confirmed in his suspicions that
she was a woman and a very beautiful one
too. He now resolved to learn her history, by
delicately drawing her out into conversation.
She had made a deep impression upon his
imagination
and promised to make a deeper one
upon his heart. That evening upon the
moonlit
deck he stood beside her and told his
discovery
of her sex and the interest he took
in her. After her embarrassment was over
she yielded to his solicitations and narrated
her history. We can only give its brief
outline
.
Ralph Horsely had clandestinely married
the only daughter of the Earl of , as we
have already intimated in a previous chapter.
By her had a daughter whose birth the mother
(broken hearted by the discovery of her
husband's
dissolute and abandoned character) did
not long survive. Jealous lest her child who
was the only heir to the Earl, should be taken
from him Horseley, determined to keep it
always
in his sight until the death of the Earl
should call for the true heir, when he intended
to present her with her claims and profit by
her accession to titles and wealth. He, soon
found in his lawless life that her sex would be
an obstacle to his keeping her in his sight,
and he resolved on the expedient when she
was in her fifth year, of putting her in boy's
costume. This he did so; and up to the
period
we now see her a fine dark haired, brown
cheeked girl of seventeen she had been
constantly
his companion as his son. He did not,
however, neglect the feminine education her
future position in society might render
necessary
;
but being an educated man himself, he
directed her studies in the leisure moments of
his wild life, found her books, and cultivated
her tastes. She, was, therefore, but little less
a woman for her male costume. This is the
outline of her story, not as Louis heard it but
as it becomes us to give to the reader. She
knew nothing of her father's motives; but
believed
that to preserve her life from an uncle
who sought it, he kept her in this disguise.
Louis found her intelligent, full of warm
impulses
,
merry hearted and delightfully
ignorant
of the world. He was surprised at her
modesty and softness of manners and suffered
himself to be led captive by her gazelle-like
eyes.
A few days passed and they had, secretly
from the father, met on deck, and let love do
dis own work of mischief in their young
hearts. Before the `Steel Arrow' reached
soundings on the American shore off Block
Island, the bewitching, spirited, modest,
romantic
little Frank or Frances Horseley, had
exchanged her heart with that of the gallant
Louis de Fernay. How secretly did the
maiden
keep her love from her father!
The morning after making the land, Louis
discovered ahead an extended fleet of ships of
war bearing down. Horseley with the glass
discovered that they carried the French flag,
when he immediately run up that of the
rebel
States. Louis's heart beat on seeing ships
of his own land, and he almost wished the
refugee smuggler might be captured. But he
thought of leaving his fair daughter and he
put the helm two points to windward to give
them a wide hirth!
It was D'Estaing's fleet the day after it left
the frigate Endymion grounded, a prize to the
two sloops of war. It was steering to
blockade
Newport and Long Island Sound; the
issue
of which expedition is a matter of history.
`The Steel Arrow' gave the fleet a wide
windward
birth and the next day under English
colors passed the Hook and took a pilot up the
harbor of New York. Horseley represented
to the pilot himself as a letter of marque, who
in his turn gave him all the current
intelligence
of the day. The French frigate he
pointed out to them anchored above the sloops
of war, and Louis felt his cheek burn with
shame as the flag of England floating above
that of France met his eye.
`Oh, that I had the power to recapture her,'
he said with animation to Horseley who stood
beside him. `I have sailed in her and know
all her officers. She was the consort of Le
Minerve which was lost in the gale in the
channel. She is the best appointed vessel in
the French Navy, and the fastest sailer.'
CHAPTER VIII.
Horseley seemed to reflect deeply a few
moments
and then said to him; `I have a plan
that will do this thing. I am an Englishman,
but my country and I for the present are at
issue. You have expressed your surprise to
see me run into this harbor so openly under
the English flag; but I have always done
bold acts without looking to the issue
trusting
for this to circumstances! These
circumstances
are now at hand to guide me. Ho,
Sir Pilot! what British officer is in command
of the prize?'
`Captain Howell Peyton.'
`That is he. Lay me alongside of the
frigate
for I have despatches for him. Nay, your
knowledge of the channel is not so good as
mine,' he cried, seizing the helm and putting
the schooner away from a dangerous shoal.
`You seem to know the harbor, sir,' said
Louis to Horsley.
`Yes. I have in the last seventeen years
been thrice to this port; and the last time
escaped from an English brig by adventuring
the passage of Hurl-gate. I safely passed
through it, while my pursuer run upon the
rocks and was lost. I could take it again at a
venture.'
`What is your plan in boarding the
frigate
?'
`I have none except that circumstances
may furnish. Pledge me your word of honor
that my character and that of my vessel shall
not be made known through you, and I will
pledge myself to restore your frigate to the
French marine.'
Louis gave the desired pledge. The
schooner
was now a league from the Battery and
fleet, slowly sailing in towards the French
frigate. Horseley went below and Louis took
his stand by Frances. She told him she
remembered
well her father's escape through
the Hurl-gate; that she stood beside him at
the time, and herself pointed out the
dangerous
spots he should avoid; and in one instance
by suddenly seizing the helm, she saved the
schooner from being dashed upon a sharp
rock. `I believe,' she added, `I could steer
a vessel through myself without assistance,
my memory of it is so vivid.'
Horsely, in half an hour afterwards,
re-appeared
on deck with several packages neatly
done up in Admiralty package paper, with
tape and seals affixed. He handed them with
a peculiar smile to Louis, who read with
surprise
the addresses to
`
Captain Howel Peyton,
Royal Navy, &c. &c.
By the hands of Capt. Walter Ousely
.
To be safely and speedily delivered
.'
`What means this?'
`That these will get me an introduction on
board the prize.'
`And then?'
`I shall, as ever, be guided by
circumstances
.'
`You will assuredly be detected as an
impostor
.'
`No.'
`You have extraordinary confidence.'
`Confidence is success.'
The Steel Arrow, under her English flag
was laid alongside the prize, and Horsely, in
full captain's uniform, got into his boat and
went on board, accompanied by his daughter.
He was received at the gang-way with the
usual honors and introduced to Captain
Peyton
,
and by him conducted into his cabin.
Here he presented his forged despatches,
which were artfully directed within to Lord
Howe, a line merely being written to Capt.
Peyton, desiring him to place them in Lord
Howe's own hands. Captain Peyton
immediately
ordered his gig to proceed to Howe's
flag-ship, which lay four miles distant, leaving
the
soi distant
Captain Walter Ousely to the
courtesy of his first lieutenant.
`Your schooner is a beautiful model,' said
Captain Peyton, as he went over the side into
his gig. `Hadn't you best anchor. She
seems to be uneasy under her topsail, and the
wind is pushing from the southwest.'
`Thank you; I shall drop anchor higher up.
I will remain here on board the prize till you
return, if you get back by sun-down, as I
should like to look through her.'
`If I should not return you will find my
state-room at your service, Captain. I hope
these despatches are of the importance you
suppose they are. It will be great news to
Howe.'
Thus speaking the English captain left his
vessel and pulled for the flag ship, obeying,
as he believed, written orders from the
Admiralty
.
Horseley, triumphant in the success thus
far of his stratagem, how turned to the first
lieutenant and said he should like to see the
ship and visit the prisoners.
From Captain Peyton he had learned that
there were now on board three hundred and
twenty French sailors; and also two or three
lieutenants and five midshipmen in
deck-horde
;
the remainder having been
transferfed
to other ships. That the English force
consisted of three lieutenants and six
midshipmen
,
and a marine guard of thirty-five men.
Conducted by the officer, whom he
ascertained
understood no French, the wily
Horseley
passed from one part of the frigate to
another; now and then addressing, in a low
tone, a few words unheard to the officers and
men, the purport of which was:
`Precisely at four bells you will find the
fore and main hatches unfastened, and the
bulk-head doors open into the state rooms.
Rise and recover your frigate. Every man of
you fly to his usual post and get her under
sail. The cables shall be cut beforehand.
You will find me at the helm. Do your duty,
and I, who am a Frenchman, disguised to
save you, will pilot you safely to sea. Tell
your fellows!'
This was spoken to as many as twenty
persons
,
by the deep scheming and talented
Horsely, who spoke the French tongue like a
native. The lidutenant did not understand,
nor did he suspect treachery from a `British
naval captain,' as he believed Horseley to be
a special agent of the Admiralty sent to
Howe. He was above suspicion, and so was
allowed to converse as he chose. In the
meanwhile all he promised to do he managed
with equal tack to perform.
It was half an hour after sunset! The
evening
was clear and starlit. A fine eight knot
breeze blew freshly up the bay. The British
fleet lay around at anchor, their lights
gleaming
over the water. Boats were pulling from
one to another or to the shore. Music was
heard floating from the deck of one; laughter
running across the water from another.
Captain
Peyton had not yet returned. All on
board the Endymion was still and orderly.
The Lieutenant and `Captain Ouseley' paced
the deck together in conversation. The Steel
Arrow still rode under her back topsail a
couple
of fathom to windward!
Suddenly a bell tolled from a distant ship;
theh another from a frigate on the Endymion's
beam; then rung out her own deep bell four
successive times. Hark! what deep sound is
that like the uprising of a multitude! The
ship quivers with a convulsive movement of
heaving life within her womb. Hark! the
hatches lift themselves to the astonished eyes
of the British marines, and like a flood of
human
beings pour upon the decks. A volley is
dischargedshrieks and cries of battle fill the
air! A firm but brief struggle takes place,
and the French are masters of their frigate.
The voice of Horseley, who is at the head, is
heard commanding. A hundred men leap into
the rigging, and in a few minutes the ship is
clothed in canvas. Her head, no longer
confined
to the anchor, swings to her course, and
in fifteen minutes from the time of the rising
of the crew, the noble vessel was steering up
East River, past the town. The Steel Arrow,
following in her wake, steered by the
astonished
Louis, who followed where love led.
On hearing the volley fired by the marines,
and the noise of conflict, boats were despatch
ed to the rescue, which were recalled when it
was discovered that she was in the hands of
the French. Two frigates got underweigh in
pursuit, and a battery opened her fire upon
them.
The frigate, with the schooner in her wake,
kept gallantly on until she came in the boiling
entrance of the Hurl-gate, when a shot, from
a sloop of war in chase, struck Horsely, as he
stood at the helm, and instantly severed his
head from his body! It was a critical moment.
`Who knows the channel?' cried the French
officer, Captain Navarre.
No one answered.
The smuggler's daughter quit her father's
corse, and, without a word took his place.
There was a deep silence in the ship, broken
only by the roar of the waves around her.
Safely, cooly, and successfully did the young
heimsman pilot the proud frigate through this
perilous pass of the seas, leaving behind all
pursuers. The frigate sailed once more in
smooth water, and the sailor maiden, leaving
the helm, knelt beside her father, whom she
had loved, and wept over him.
At day-light the two vessels were abreast
New Haven light, and Louis, laying the Steel
Arrow along side the escaped frigate, went on
board, where he was welcomed by all with
joy. He told his story and that of Horseley
and his daughter. Captain Navarre said she
should be a daughter to him, and inviting her
to take the cabin, he gave up to her poor
Madeline's
wardrobe, which both he and Louis
insisted she should wear. She reappeared in
her female costume, in which, unused as she
was to it, she appeared a little awkward, but
by no means ungraceful. If Louis had thought
her a handsome boy, he now thought her,
notwithstanding
her grief and tears for her
father
,
a lovely girl. She remained on board
the Endymion three months, a passenger, and
then was married to Louis by the ships chap
lain. Henry Monteith, who had been made a
prisoner of war a few days before, and
released
on parole by his friends, being his chief
groomsman.
Subsequently, on proving her title on her
return to England, Madame Frances de
Fernay
,
the smuggler's daughter, became heiress
of the title and Earldom of , and also
to the estate of Sir Edward Horseley, to
obtain
which her father had been guilty of so
great a series of sanguinary crimes. Henry
Monteith never marriedthe memory of
Madeline
Navarre being too sacred in his
memory
to be replaced by another. Josephine de
Fernay, finding that she had lost Louis
forever
,
and resolved to love no other, secluded
herself in a convent. Zebedee Beebe, being
landed at Newport, from the Steel Arrow,
arrived
safely among his kindred, the Coffins,
in Nantucket, and for many years entertained
the villagers with his tales of the smugglers.
The Steel Arrow was taken back to
England
,
by request of Frances, whose attachment
to it was naturally very great, and it
afterwards
was remodelled into a yacht, in which
she and her husband, with parties of their
friends, often took excursions upon the
channel
,
and even crossed to the Chateau de
Fernay
;
but these expeditions were more pacific
than when Ralph Horseley, or `Black Ralph,'
the smuggler, commanded her. And, as she
no longer carried at her peak the `Steel
Arrow
,'
she ceased longer, as formerly, to carry
terror and excite hostility wherever her green
flag was seen floating to the breeze.
THE END.Sir
You are commanded by the Minister
of War, to give passage to America, to M. St
Clair Lorraine, a Colonel, and bearer of
private
despatches to the Marquis de la Fayette.
Signed
Proveaux
,
Minister of Marine
.
To M. Navarre,
Captain, Line-of-battie-ship Minerve.Dearest Madeline
I find the scheme I
suggested when I was fastening on you your
bracelet this afternoon, wholly impracticable
for many reasons. I have determided to take
passage in the same ship with you as M. St.
Clair Lorraine, bearer of despatches, and
meet my ship in America, where it is to join
lord Howe. I have written for, and shall
obtain
leave, and in the mean time anticipate it.
Betray no surprise or recognition on meeting
me in the morning at table. I look forward
to a happy passage across the Atlantic in your
sweet society. You will think I am an
audaucious
intriguer; but what will not love
undertake
for its object?
Devotedly,
Montieth
.'